Now, I'm off to work on an interpretation of animus.
Life as you have known it and perceived it is rapidly falling away and being replaced with ways that are better and which ensure the good of all, not just the few.
Pirates of Dark Water:
Those who hate the West point to the evil we have done, but by any standards the evil is minor when set against the good.
Favorite Cable TV Drama
“No, I didn’t mean it like that.”, This was somehow getting embarrassing now. “Pick me up from the hotel at 5 tomorrow then?”, I said looking at Young.
In Chiapas, Mexico, portions of the indigenous populations, such as Mayans and Tzotzils, have embraced Islam. Photo: Tumblr: Ihavefaith
When three-quarters of Americans think the country is on the “wrong track” and even Bill Clinton calls the economy “lousy,” how then to run for a second term? Traveling Tuesday to Osawatomie, Kan., site of a famous 1910 Teddy Roosevelt speech, Obama laid out the case.
Well, we’ve completed our second day of training in the CERT Train-the-Trainer class that we’re conducting here in Austin, Texas. Tonight, I thought I’d tell you about the cultural diversity in our class and more specifically about the culture of two of our students.
The Google Nexus S is the former lead Android device and the Samsung Galaxy Nexus’s immediate predecessor. It’s a decent phone, with a 4-inch Super AMOLED display and a 1GHz single-core processor. It didn’t rock people’s world half as much as the Galaxy Nexus has, though.
Tomato, 2 pcs
Last week, some under the radar but generational shifting changes in Kenya education scene were announced. In one setting, Higher Education Minister, William Ruto wondered why the government should keep investing significant sums of money in churning out graduates who do not contribute to Vision 2030. In another setting, Education Permanent Secretary, Ole Kiyapi, indicated that teachers will need to get 3 year renewal teaching permits and those who cannot deliver will be shown the door. As is usual, the hue and cry has already began and it is only a while before politicians treat us to a theater of the absurd.
Keep a cool head !
‘If you want to put effort into something, grow a beard,’ he said. ‘And then take your beard and hang out in trendy cafés and write poetry. That’ll kill three birds with one stone.’
Great Expectations
Until years after the fact, looking back at pictures and thinking...
Ganesa felt bound to grant them their wish. This tells us two things. Indians believed that God does not enter our mind and change it for us. And Indians also believed that God is bound to grant the wishes of his devotees.
Tall, slender, with blue eyes and reddish-brown hair, MacMonnies first achieved fame after he designed the celebrated centerpiece for the World’s Columbian Exposition in Chicago in 1893 — the sculpture of Columbia in her Grand Barge of State in the central fountain of the Court of Honor.
I saw no animals on the trip, other than two wolves that I saw five minutes from my home when I was returning on Thursday evening. I had a good look at them as we sized each other up for a few minutes but was so surprised to see them that I didn’t even think to pick up my camera. I had a glimpse of two wolves running off the road back in February. Other than that I’ve never seen wolves near the road in 35 years in the Yukon.
STREET FOOD
* 2 cups sifted cake flour (not self-rising; sift before measuring)
The tourneys are a bit harder to figure out – but, right now, it’s like I’m playing with scared money. I think that I have a psychological aversion to dipping below my $100 deposit on FT, probably due to my bad run at Stars. The long and short is I’m playing dinky little 1 and 2 table SNGs, and making some stupid moves.
Ophelia, John Everett Millais, 1851-52
I marked off 1.5 inches twice. This was just enough to get me folding. Start folding accordion style.
- gift category for friends, it only pays (well) if it happens
In a cover story highlighting this year's batch of summer reading, journalist Josh Hammer calls A Town Like Paris "a refreshing variation on a shopworn theme: the Anglophone at large in the French capital".
SPEAKER
He's got gonorrhea, the cankers, and syph,
Melissa and Katie were blessed to have Nana, (Dave’s mother) around for much longer. Nana passed away two years ago. A few years before Nana died, she gave me a beautiful necklace with a diamond pendant made from her wedding ring along with a pair of diamond earrings. She asked me to give these special gifts to Melissa and Katie for their sixteenth birthdays. Even though Nana wasn’t around to celebrate, my daughters were so happy to receive such special keepsakes from her. Hugs from heaven.
The lens died.
They're scented, so for me, I don't use them every day, but on weekends, it's a good ritual to butter up your elbows and knees, and the skin on your knuckles and stuff. It has lasting effects, even if you only do it once a week.
Lisa Call Oil painting. Because it's a messy process. Textiles are dry and don't lend them self well to making a squishy mess. Oil painting is also the gold standard for medium and it would be fun to not be on the fringe working in textiles for a while.
WARNING……Be prepared to have LOTS OF TIME on your side….cause you’re GONNA NEED IT….Your mouth will water with all the GORGEOUS files she’s designed!!!!!! Be sure to leave her some blog love too!!!! She CERTAINLY deserves it!!!!!
Your Power is always in the present moment!!
1/4 C hot sauce
This is a whole grain black rice from Piemonte called il riso nero Venere. Claiming to be the original black aromatic rice- it’s not actually a traditional Italian variety, but rather a relatively new cross-bred hybrid named after Venus, the Goddess of Love.
“Well, let’s have a look then,” the Pakistani medic replied sympathetically. Bill let go of the strip of fabric he was holding with his teeth and, when his arm fell out, the medic fainted on the spot. Alan fainted too. They flew him to the British base at Akrotiri on Cyprus, where his arm was amputated and, by the time my chum Ozymandias met him, he had an artificial one.
Betty Lou Blue has gigantic feet and although her mother assures her that beauty comes from within, it's hard to get past the teasing she must endure from bullies like Jimmy Jack Jones. One day, during a sudden snow storm, Betty Lou must decide whether or not to use the power of her snowshoe-like feet for good or leave her tormentors to their fate. This is a children's book so you can guess her choice.
So while Platform still feels somewhat alienating in its distance, what felt like mere dullness on my 42" LCD TV at home came off on the comparably larger dimensions of a movie screen like a profound sense of aimless historical drift, in which 10 years of Chinese modernization, from the late '70s to the early '80s, gradually lead up to a finale which vividly illustrates that familiar saying, "The more things change, the more things stay the same." Certainly, I didn't feel a chill in my spine on TV that I did in the theater with the film's final shot, which, thanks to an impeccably placed musical crescendo on the soundtrack that's almost Pendereckian in impact, powerfully exudes a feeling of dreams dashed, of lives mired in a dead end that the characters barely seem to perceive.
(Marked by) pursuit of wealth, status, and power.
I also have been to a few Open Mics in the Pacific Northeast, Canada, Southwest, and many other areas we have traveled. Just Google 'Open Mics' and you might be surprised at what comes up. Maybe a little digging will take place. Ask Facebook friends, I did and they gave me so much other information for future travels.
October 31, 2012: White House Press Secretary Rick Santorum, frothing at the mouth, holds a press conference announcing the redrafting of Executive Order 10450.
Ana Akhmatova: Selected Poems (This book of poems is so amazing! So beautifully heart-breaking!)
The bottom layer of the dessert was a moist chocolate cake. The recipe from ATK uses a flourless chocolate cake, but I decided to use my favorite Ina Garten chocolate recipe instead. This may have been a bad decision, as the cake baked in the cake rings all fell apart when I unmolded them! I suppose the flourless chocolate cake would have provided a more stable and dense cake, but in the end I was glad I went with the Ina Garten cake recipe since the resulting cake was very moist and not too heavy with the mousse.
Lang professed in interview after interview to have gotten the inspiration for this film after visiting New York City but this statement is challenged in Patrick MacGilligan biography “Fritz Lang: The Nature of the Beast” as Lang taking credit where it is not due, just as his claims that he used 26,000 male extras and 11,000 female extras in the film are questionable.
At precisely 13:13, a boy aged 13 was seen by the St John Ambulance team at Lowestoft Seafront Air Festival in Suffolk after he was struck by lightning, a spokesman said.
Peter leaps over the couch he was lying on, sword drawn ready for action
One of my earliest memories is asking my Grandmother to do something for me when I was about four years old: “Grandma, tell Mommy that I want her to make a chocolate cake today.” My Grandmother refused my request and made it a teaching moment: “David, you will have to learn to ask Mommy yourself.” Both my Mom and Dad have been profoundly deaf since birth. At the time, my Grandmother was living with us and I was starting to rely on her to interpret more detailed conversations with my parents. Grandma’s gentle rebuke taught me both responsibility and an early awareness that the language my parents used (American Sign Language) is a unique and complex language.
I hit Lucky Strike Lanes for happy hour one afternoon and, in the process sampled some 2-for-1 beers that included Odell Brewing's Easy Street Wheat. The bartend-ress compared this one to Blue Moon, but Easy Street arrived smelling slightly alcoholic, so I’d describe it as Blue Moon’s slightly more aggressive sister, tasting more of wheat without the spice of Blue Moon. They may be related somehow, but they’re distinctly different. (For the record, I’d originally ordered an Odell’s 90 Shilling, but Lucky Strike evidently doesn’t carry that product any longer.) To follow up the Easy Street Wheat, I had a glass of Sam Adam’s October fest and marveled at the beauty of its orange color and nice caramel component. Boston Brewing rarely disappoints.
This little rose garden will be extended to include the shrubs. I hate digging up grass though. But Kevin might help, since he hates weed-whacking between the shrubs. The one at the back by the fence is a bridal-wreath spirea, but I don't remember what the closer one is (near the stray plastic bag). I'm going to have fun in the garden this year!
January 4 - Gerry Rafferty, pop musician ("Right Down the Line"), 63
*slow nod*
Designed to provide informative, provocative conversation and hands-on tutorials, the GC Sessions serve as an incubator for musicians, providing them an opportunity to network with their peers in an intimate setting and gain career-fostering advice from their heroes. Topics for this evening’s event with Slash include guitar techniques and his Gibson signature guitars, songwriting tips, touring and music business advice, and insider insight into the book Reckless Road. The evening will be powered by Gibson, Ernie Ball and Real Deal Media.
Finally, we had a coffee which was served with an Amaretti biscuit, which I’m pleased to say did make it into the doggy bag for Mr W, because at this point there was a very real danger of it being the equivalent to Mr Creosote’s ‘wafer thin mint’, and an explosion would have spoilt the evening!
‘Chime’ is maybe the best book I’ve read all year. It’s beautifully written: lyrical, funny, full of twists and turns and drama - and with a fantastic sense of place. Briony’s voice is astounding. I’ll leave you with an extract. Here she is, talking to herself, as Eldric’s tutor Mr Drury vanishes into the swamp:
It was about Brooklyn, but it was, of course, about business: logos, t-shirts, hats, and other Brooklyn Nets merchandise at the Modell's across from the in-construction Barclays Center arena.
Among the themes that came through fairly consistently was that the reason religion (Christianity included) has often produced only mediocre results in making the world a better place, is the lack of understanding and consistently living by love.
and then you have to be alert the whole time!
I’m sitting here sipping my green tea. I have finished eating my scone from a local bakery. I know you shouldn’t do that, but I don’t need another sweet treat.
was little we only got fruit popsicles!")
Now not everyone has the same business sense as Warren Buffet, and not everyone is going to be a multi-billionaire in their lifetime. However, it is up to you as to how you choose to live your life.
After we got home she was even more confused since we did not bring a camper home with us. Here is the conversations that followed that evening:
Daffy, I know. And really kinda embarrassing to even admit. But hell, I thought to myself, if I’m going to be a new bachelorette, I should totally watch The Bachelorette and figure out what it’s all about. Right?
The bike lanes on Dundurn North will connect to the well-established bike lanes on York Boulevard by Dundurn Castle, a connection through Victoria Park towards downtown Hamilton, and the popular cycling connection over Hwy. 403 to Westdale and McMaster University.
The wolf sits back
The gardens all around Delhi are full of spring blossoms. The park where I go for my walks is named “Vasant Vatika“, which means “spring garden“.
The fried crab was ok but a tiny serving, which I guess for £4 is all I should expect. It tasted like fried chicken rather than crab, the crabbiness was fried out of it I guess.
Tea with lemon, knitting (a plain shawl with moss stitch edging, out of the lovely Lorna’s Laces Solemate,) and lots of laptop time. In particular, I’m enjoying a systematic reading of one of my favourite blogs: Needled: by Kate Davies, interesting to anyone with an interest in knitting, reading, feminist history, textile history (including the history of bathing suits, the topic of Kate’s latest issue of Textisles, her e-magazine), epublishing, hiking, stroke recovery, home-brewed beer, Scotland, and dogs. In other words, a fair cross-section of those reading this blog, I’m pretty sure . . .
I barely held it together a couple of weeks back when MJ found himself working incredibly long hours (not-for-fun), coming home not-too-happy, for about 8 days in a row.
Earlier this week, my new old friend posted the following photo on Facebook:
One cynical blogger, was so incensed that the header read: “Genocidal war criminal wins Presidential Medal whilst invoking Holocaust memories.” (ii.)
So here's to Busting the Newbie Blues! Don't be discouraged. Instead, take action! Participate in my Busting the Newbie Blues event, which will run from December 3rd through December 31st.
05-12 Victoria, British Columbia – Club 919
I do not want to play any board games, like Monopoly.
time pieces, and clock images to create a timeless layout, album or card.
MOVIE OF THE YEAR
But I want to baby you make me want to,
Falling for the ploy.
series 7 (644-752)
On men
Note the ransom:
I’m not sure about this Law of Attraction stuff – an hour of worrying will cause this? And so quickly? It doesn’t seem fair. What about all the good feelings and thoughts I allow and focus upon for much of the day? The good stuff doesn’t seem to actualize as quickly as the bad stuff. Really, it doesn’t seem fair!
Harry Lookofsky – Violin, George Young – Tenor Sax, Mark Egan - Bass
3. find coordinating colors, I used regal rose, and pink passion (stamp pads only)
Slowly but surely, the five of us made it up and could see the other group going through the same decision points below us while Christian and Andy jaunted along behind them. Some fog had rolled in with the drizzle as we had to cross the top of one of the waterfalls. We went further back a bit and found a good crossing.
For the fifth consecutive month, the Fed Funds Rate vote was nearly unanimous. Just one FOMC member, Richmond Federal Reserve President Jeffrey Lacker, dissented in the 9-1 vote.
(April) “I too had my smartmeter burn out and had a hell of a time getting FPL to fix everything. Their meter burned the wiring in my home behind the box that they said was up to me to get fixed on my own and that they could only repair the meter and wires from the pole to the box. I had 2 electricians come out and they said it was an FPL problem. Ended up there is an outside company that installs the meters for FPL and they ended up paying for my problem after FPL denied my claim for them to pay for the damages.”
I am sir, very respectfully, your obedient servant, G. T. Beauregard
1 oz. Willamette (5% AA, 45 min.) Flowers
On the top left of the script (short hand, in this case, for laboratory work order), my doctor’s medical assistant had hand written the following, “Do this 2 wks. prior to Dec. appt.” That was to be my next six month appointment. Interesting tidbit: the first nephrologist felt I should be seen in the office once a year, the second – and present – one felt six month visits would be a better option for me. Different doctors – different orders.
To be published January 2013
And then I go back to sleep.
"Emily, I am confused. I don't know what you are talking about. I didn't shoot any bunnies."
A great match for the flamboyantly floral aromas and luscious tropical fruit flavors of our Viognier is grilled or broiled seasoned chicken strips glazed with a peach, mango or papaya salsa. Other good matches include Thai food, pumpkin soup, orange-glazed halibut and creamy curries.
Week 4, Date #5
This is my town.
Not one other actor makes any bit of difference here, but as anyone would expect, this is more about keeping the audience distracted with nonsense than it is about a story or (God forbid) characters. Everyone is an idiot, including Doc Bloom who just sits there, listening and setting himself up for something anyone could see a million miles away.... OOH!! But I almost didn't mention Ricky's girlfriend! Yeah; our nutcase lead had a girlfriend! And not just any girlfriend, his girlfriend Jennifer is played by b-movie legend Elizabeth Kaitan, who is by default the most entertaining, most interesting, most likable and most delightfully quirky individual in this whole opportunistic mess. Her eyes, her smile, her voice and certainly the way she just reacts to the nonsense around her suggest a movie that could have been. Here, she is introduced, shows Ricky some happiness, gets dispatched easily (*gulp* Uh-Oh!) and is forgotten. Too bad.
Looking harder now, he saw that she was an enormous sea snail, with the prettiest iridescent shell and bright blue antenna eyes waving in the water.
I will give up my bag of potato chips for a candy bar ANY DAY. I love candy.
So I had a small snit fit at the check in counter because I was mad, and I was mad that I was mad, and yes my luggage was heavy but I live in NORWAY dammit and they DON'T HAVE VELVEETA THERE so this luggage policy is very anti-expatriate, and my parents were there, watching and being supportive and I didn't want to say bye and I didn't want to have a snit in front of them because I'm a BIG GIRL dammit and big girls don't have snits at airports, and Aunt Flo is coming any minute so I am on the razor's edge of moody and irritable and can snap you like a twig if you look at me funny, and check in people at airports generally annoy me, though I can't put my finger on WHY, and did I mention I am just pissed off that I am so pissed off? And to top it off, I really don't feel like doing any of the following:
So I guess it is time to confess that I am guilty of not only weighing in on my blog but also I became guilty of not physically weighing in which resulted in me gaining weight.
I began the expansion of the front bed, curving it around to the cellar doors. As long as I was working up a sweat, I continued digging and got a bed 4 foot deep and 32 feet long on the east side of the house. I put a THICK layer of donkey doo and a top dressing of grass clippings on the whole section. These beds will be ready to plant next spring. It's not the final size, but a good start on it.
.......sorry but life has been up to its usual rubbishy tricks lately resulting in no crafting or enthusiasm to do anything. Hubby is again out of work. He lost his job in June last year and managed to secure work in November for a six month contract. We had hoped the contract would be renewed but NO, not hubby's, so its back to the job centre!!!
Organic cosmetics offer women suffering from cancer a
Thankfully we are all safe and the only damage we have at home is a little water blowing in our patio door, a flipped trampoline and the swingset has taken a hit.
That fate is no worse
Being in such a place surrounded by people from all walks of life; listening to them speaking many languages; watching exhibitions of unfamiliar cultures; and smelling a wide variety of aromas coming from foods and humans, I’m reminded of the Tower of Babel.
“While this revolution has been taking place over the last decade, this year marked a milestone. Publishers Weekly, the leading industry periodical, published an article titled 'Self Publishing Titles Topped 764,000in 2009 as Traditional Output Dipped' essentially declaring victory. Reporter Jim Milliot states the latest Bowker data, the industry measuring stick, shows “the number of ‘non-traditional’ titles dwarfed those of traditional books.”
It is the one thing
Seasonal Fresh Fruit Selected By Maria Loi
I ended up buying an interesting little glossy book titled “Everything You’ve Ever Wanted to Know About Anarchism But Were Afraid to Ask” which apparently has no author. It’s actually not very well written or thought out. There are a good amount of mistakes in the author’s reasoning as well as his/her spelling and word usage. But it’s still a fun little treat. I also bought “A Peoples History of America” by Howard Zinn and “Chomsky on Anarchism”, which is a collection of essays and interviews from Noam Chomsky regarding Anarchism. And, to round out the revolutionary literature, my wife bought Che Guevara’s “Motorcycle Diaries” which are his own diaries in his own words from that fateful trip around South America.
It’s never too early to introduce young ladies to a sophisticated tea party. State on the invitation that the guests should bring large sun hats to wear, and when they arrive, have a basket full of costume or plastic jewelry for them to dress up with and take home as party favors. Serve small cucumber sandwiches with the crusts cut off and lots of herbal and fruit flavored tea of many kinds. Wear a big hat yourself and join in on the fun! Once the table is cleared of breakables, you can play musical chairs.
the frigidness of betrayal that batters and breaks the will
“The first word of the first psalm, blessed, sets the tone: happy, fortunate, lucky with holy luck. The second psalm uses the same word at its finish.” (24)
Catelynn: "Okay, sorry."(She apologizes. Again. Even though she wasn't in the wrong.)
Located in the gothic George’s Street Arcade building, the Market bar is the perfect place to get away from the everyday. Its rustic, open plan design creates the perfect dining atmosphere, casual and airy during the daytime, candle-lit and sophisticated at night.
Cesare, Sforza, and Alexander head north in their richly appointed but uncomfortable looking carriage. Della Rovere and his newest friend watch them go and disgustedly observe that he’s left a girl in charge. DR’s friend promises to write to Savonarola in Florence about this latest outrage.
I had 842 glasses of wine (and a few shots of tequila) while waiting.
I'm starting to wonder if I need to invest in a new camera.
1. Borrow, don't buy, your books and supplemental materials. I know, books are nice (you should see my house---I am a book junkie) BUT they can be expensive. If this is the year you are on a very tight budget, then try one of these ways to obtain the books you need:
"Love is the amazing wish to be irresistibly preferred." - Level Twain
Music and its simple joys is one of the themes that unite the distinct stories. A dancer in Budapest in 1623 inspires a man of chemistry to invent a cymbal, the prototype of today’s premium brand found on many drum kits. Count Basie’s inaugural performance at the Roseland Ballroom in New York City on Christmas Eve brings lovers together: “The music had swung them here… this happy romantic rhythm would kill them both.”
The Art of Exporting / Cristina Querrer
(Marshfield, WI) – Members of the Marshfield Police Department shot and killed a bear in the 1400 block of Arlington St on April 9th, at 9:54 pm.
I say, yuck. I can sometimes appreciate a bite or two of a high-quality chocolate something, but generally, chocolate and I are not tight. (Thank you, taste buds). To me, a yogurt parfait, some kind of fruity tart/cake, carrot, banana, or zucchini bread all leave chocolate in their dust.
TommyCat looks like he could be Bob's brother. He's tall and thin and sleek and black. He lets me pet him in exchange for food, although he prefers not to be touched.
I tucked into a delicious plate of bubble ‘n’ squeak with hogs pudding, poached egg and truffle oil. Something that might have been quite ordinary was transformed into something unexpected and superb. And yes, once again I was so busy chatting and enjoying myself I forgot to take a picture.
I’m ashamedly no expert on this veteran metal band’s discography, but my current perception is that Anthrax’s heavy-thrash legacy is no less potent than their strongest efforts with this comeback album (their first in 8 years), and the return of singer Joey Belladonna proves the new(/old) Anthrax to be powerful competition against the modern metal world. Mind your bones when moshing.
For my part, I agree with Buddha as I have imagined him. But I do not know how to prove that he is right by any argument such as can be used in a mathematical or a scientific question. I dislike Nietzsche because he likes the contemplation of pain, because he erects conceit into a duty, because the men whom he most admires are conquerors, whose glory is cleverness in causing men to die. But I think the ultimate argument against his philosophy, as against any unpleasant but internally self-consistent ethic, lies not in an appeal to facts, but in an appeal to the emotions. Nietzsche despises universal love; I feel it the motive power to all that I desire as regards the world. His followers have had their innings, but we may hope that it is coming rapidly to an end.
Saturday, March 15, 7:00-9:30 PM
You can't change others. Like the brother who is notoriously late and doesn't understand how hard it is to deal with when you live by a precise schedule of two small children. He won't change for me, it is what it is.
I think that everyone is getting too distracted by words and opinions, and they’re missing some important points as a result.
Author: Jessica Martinez
It’s obvious that Apple thinks that a large portion of the world is not very bright. But do they think that EVERYONE is an idiot?
On women.
Library Internet.
There had been two small children in church this morning, a little girl slightly younger than Zerlina and her brother, who is at the fast-crawling stage. They got about a bit (we're having services in the church rooms during the winter for warmth) and it was very entertaining, they're lovely little children. The girl wanted to take a Communion wafer to her mother. She had her eye on the chalice, I suspect, too, but that was kept firmly away. During the last hymn, she came and fixed me with a beady gaze. I found it hard not to laugh, which isn't ideal with a clarinet. Afterwards, she said "More, more!" So, after the service finished, I played another verse of the last hymn and everyone good-humouredly applauded. "More, more," she said again, so I agreed to play one last verse. She asked for more again, but I pointed out that no one could leave until I finished, so it would have to wait until another day. In the kitchen, I rewarded her with a chocolate biscuit. It was terribly flattering. Two encores and asked for a third!
“Tell me thy company and I will tell thee what thou art.” Miguel De Cervantes
Well, guess what? My new book 101 Contrarian Ideas About Advertising has just been published.
If the 1st four games of this week are any indication of what is to come in the rest of the series, then the east coast better be ready.
This is one of the busynesses I have been up to lately (apart from writing silly limericks)... click on the picture for a larger version.
(Elizabeth Phillips & David Schulps, Trouser Press)
I am really puzzled as to why this is called Pataleshwar ‘Caves’. There are no caves, even though the original intention may have been to create rock-cut caves. And the lack of information available on the Caves is frustrating, to say the least. The Wikipedia page on Pataleshwar Caves is about 8-10 sentences strung together with some photographs. There are some good blog posts on the Pataleshwar Caves, like the ones here and here, but they do not throw any new light on the origins or history of the Caves.
But come Christmas of 2005 and Vivek showed his true colours.
Life shouldn’t be about stressing and rushing around getting from one place to another all the time. When travelling, a lot of time is spent waiting or sitting on an aeroplane before finally reaching your destination, so why not enjoy that experience too? Use the time to relax so you can begin your holiday in the right frame of mind. You can apply this mindset in everyday life too – waiting in a queue or sitting in traffic doesn’t have to be a frustrating experience if you appreciate that you have time to relax, to listen to music or enjoy the company that you are sharing the moment with.
We went to the shopping district, not for the shopping, but to stroll along the beautifully lit walkway at Shinkong Mitsukoshi. There were street performers along the walkway, singing oldies with a big caption screen at the back for you to sing along. The music, the lights, the breeze made a perfect evening stroll for us before getting dinner at Sanji Ramen.
to carry us away.
My BOYS:
odčitkovUkrepi, blood pressure and heart out of hand. Automatic shutdown
But fear of legal action might not stop the use of such technology from growing, especially now that prices for such snooping equipment are dropping.
Farther out, but no more civilized than Woodland Hills, is Chatsworth. It is stuck, like a tire nail, in the northwestern end of the hot, dry and dusty San Fernando Valley. It was once ranchy and rural but is now raunchy and rotten.
ripples
5. When the head has become too small for hot stones, pour in hot sand, which will reach smaller places that the stones couldn't. Repeat this over and over until the head is as small as its going to get. Then rub more hot stones on the outside of the face to burnish any wrinkled areas and to make the features more prominent.
In the meantime, let me wish you all a happy new year.
A side view of the Bionicles and Legos currently on display
The old woman told him that he could have it, but the man refused to take it for nothing and promised to come back the following night to collect and pay for it.
Jered Weaver pitched the 2nd no-hitter of the season last night against the Twins. Of course, it came against the worst team in the league. How can a team with Joe Mauer be the worst? Wouldn’t that guarantee you a top 25 spot?
Next time you set down to write, let your mind do the work, let creativity drip from the pen and don’t hesitate to make even the most absurd situations or characters. After all, creativity is the absence of limitations.
Primary Responsibilities:
Alright that is all I can think of for now, sorry no pictures but I am sure I will catch up on all of those in the next few weeks. My goal for this year is to stay on top of the blog instead of catching up all the time because it sure makes it a pain at the end of the year and making the blog book if I get too far behind :)
I’ve always been excessively hard on myself. Now, I want to make it clear: I was (and still am) absolutely loved by my family and I love them too. It’s just that life had, unfortunately, dealt me a difficult hand that had me believing from a very young age that I wasn’t good enough and that I was too much in all the wrong ways. So I learned to put crazy expectations on myself, to cut myself down and, to a great extent, despise myself. Looking at that little girl and realizing I would have loved her if she had been anyone but me really hurt. I wanted to reach into the photo and hold her in my arms and tell her that I loved her, that I was so sorry for not loving or appreciating her. I wanted so badly to hear that she forgave me, but all I had were my tears and a huge gaping pain I couldn’t close.
When I was very young, perhaps 6, I taught myself how not to cry. How to shut down any emotion or sense I might feel and go numb from the inside out. It worked, but now happens involuntarily and I feel dead during this time.
Chrys.: Yet not even by these words were the disciples set right, but speak yet to Him as to man; “They answered unto Him, We have here but five loaves and two fishes.” From this we learn the philosophy of the disciples, how far they despised food; they were twelve in number, yet they had but five loaves and two fishes; for things of the body were contemned by them, they were altogether possessed by spiritual things. But because the disciples were yet attracted to earth, the Lord begins to introduce the things that were of Himself; “He saith unto them, Bring them hither to me.”
Conversations with the kids dad have been quite easy and nice. I’ve been sending him pictures of everything we do. Here’s Alijah with the farm cat. We went out to my friends house in the country. It was a really nice night with my girls and all the kids had a great time.
D.H: Stopped! Punt. Giants have the ball with 3:46 and one time out.
Recently, this still life painting sold at a Massachusetts auction house for $190,000.00! What is significant about this piece of news is that the owner of this painting purchased it 18 months ago at his local South Carolina Goodwill for $3.00. Leroy, a former antiques dealer had been perusing his local Goodwill and noticed the frame of this painting. When he got it home he thought perhaps it may be worth a bit more, so her researched similar still life's on eBay and decided he could sell it for $100.00. His daughter- in- law had other ideas so she took it to the Antiques Roadshow and they recognized it as a 1650 Flemish painting and gave a conservative estimate of $30,000. It turns out that they were all wrong because on March 2, 2012 at auction the painting sold for $190,00!
It was probably the evening of the baseline, or even the next day, when my husband and I finally pinpointed the source of my craziness. The transvaginal ultrasound.
It makes no difference what RULES or PLAN a trader has in place if HE/SHE does not follow them!
No problem, I explained, but our policy is that children have to be seated whilst in the pub. As an example, I pointed to the wicker screen we had up separating the room from the one next door, and told him that it wasn't secure it was just there so people couldn't see the refurbishment going on behind it. If his son had knocked into it and it fell on him, I'm sure the father wouldn't be impressed.
fried pickle,
After the conference we’ll share them all on a blog and in the IH Journal. We may even have a vote to decide the best tip of all.
behind to nail Mitt Romney while Michele
Unfortunately for the Alliance there had been little in the way of electoral successes at a local level during her time as an MP and much of her support joined (or rejoined) the Labour party rather than the Lib Dems once she left the scene. The prospect of local electoral success was reckoned, correctly, to be much higher. In addition the network of support for the Alliance, especially in the north of the borough where the SDP had been strong evaporated. The southern end of the borough, around Eltham and Plumstead Common, as well as patches in Greenwich town centre, held up better as this was where the Liberal Party had been stronger. However the very sudden loss of support, after little in the way of local in-filling during the Rosie years, was to negatively affect the local Liberal Democrats for years. It may also have been the case that the dominance of community politics that then held sway was to put off ex SDP members who were used to painting on a bigger canvas.
that these footprints
Trick is you just need to sit down and start it. If you are having problems search online on tips of how to start that aspect or start using note pads to come up with your plan of action. This takes sometime, but if you can go into your project with a giant idea of who you want it to work/look, then all you need to do is figure out the base (which is the starting point).
I want to download the latest movies without wiping out my Cap, will this service help me ?
Sashimi was fresh albeit slices being small, guess you could just take more if you want more anyway haha. But good thing is, and what I like is that they dont lay out everything at once or a lot of the seafood/sashimi at once but instead, when its almost finished, they replenish it! Think this ensures the freshness of the food!
I revere Brian, adore Carl and sort of quietly respect the other Beach Boys. But I think Tony Asher and Van Dyke Parks might have been the most valuable people in that entire enterprise over the years, simply because of their abilities to write lyrics that didn’t embarrass anybody.
Uncomfortable. Right.
I know the gentle breeze will open this sheeted fate,
The timing ended up being perfect- I didn't need them in November or December because I had enough holiday treats and with moving in January it would have been a challenge to ship them to the right address. Tristen is super sweet and shipped them to me all the way from Atlanta. Thanks to Elle & Tristen for these delicious treats!
Often times I hear people say, well- I'm too broke (money is too tight) for me to spend my money on things that we don't need right now. The answer is to start slow! Every week set up a budget just for stockpiling! If you only have $10 for stockpiling than that's a start. Scan the weekly coupon match-ups and challenge yourself to see how much you can get for $10. Deals vary each week, one week might be slow, and the next week is a jackpot, but if you use coupons, I can guarantee that you'd be surprised what $10 can buy you! Just look for the Free, or less than 50 cents items at the stores and $10 could be the beginning step to a nice stockpile. If this still is not making sense, than think about it this way- Instead of buying a big bag of potato chips and a twelve pack of soda the next time that your at the grocery store, instead invest that money on your stockpile!
The description states the app has “the ability to create virtual notebooks for your iPad, letting you share your ideas visually with handwritten notes, sketches or doodles. Paired with the Bamboo Stylus, it turns your iPad into the ultimate paperless communications tool.” Although it appears you can continue to create new pages, I have not figured out how to create more than one notebook. UPDATE: An email from support states they are “currently working on an update of Bamboo paper. The new version will, besides other nice features, also include multiple notebooks.” So, right now, multiple notebooks are not available. You can learn more about the app and see a short video here at a Wacom site.
d. I do not have children myself, although I desperately wish to have them in the future, it seems strange to think that within the next ten years if I am lucky I will have my own child. Although I have no children I know that when they happen, I will love and fiercely protect them, I couldn’t even think about giving them away and I know that none of the women in my family could of done it either. It’s so clear that Angela truly loved this tiny baby boy the agnoy she must of had to endure hearing him crying and not being able to say goodbye, just to hear your baby taken away from you by voices and then having ot wait so long to have another child, it is so heart-breaking. People would assume that because of this the book makes you sad and yes it does there was a period where I had to just leave it for a little while, I had to think hard about what I had read and it even made me tear up. This said it is also so beautiful we know from the blurb that Angela w
“This way! Hurry! Follow the arrow!”
Only on day two and already I've screwed up. Oh well. I'm not perfect, I just like to try to be. However, I think I still handled my screw up well and I'll tell you why. Today my routine varied in a way I wasn't prepared for. I had to go out of town for a class for my job that lasted from 7 a.m. to 3 p.m. And it was an hour drive each way so that means I was away from my home and my healthy food for ten hours today. At a McDonald's. Ugh. For some reason I thought I'd be okay. Thought I could still stick to the plan. I ate my tasty breakfast at 5:45 right before I had to run out the door and I brought my lemon water with me.
If I was walking down the street and a guy was yelling at me to get in his car, I would probably have 911 dialled and ready to call on my phone. I’d have my keys in between my fingers ready to use as a weapon and stab his eyes out.
We are animals. It’s best not to water it down, but to recognize how cognitively uncomfortable it makes us to self-identify in this way. Have you ever noticed how easy it is to have an ah-ha moment and how difficult it is to incorporate the implications of that moment into your own daily life? This phenomenon would surely be less ubiquitous than it is if we were, in fact, creatures of rationality. But the truth is that this conscious-verbal cognition that we experience, that we generally identify as our ‘self’, is only one small part of us, and, contrary to contemporary mythology, it is not in control. In his book The Happiness Hypothesis Jonathan Haidt develops the metaphor of the rider and the elephant to explore the realities of what he calls ‘the divided self.’ As he puts it, “I can direct things, but only when the elephant doesn’t have desires of his own. When the elephant really wants to do something. I’m no match for him.”
As a note for people who moderate or administrate communities of any kind:
22.) I Wrote A Tough Nuclear Bill - NOT EXACTLY, your bill was rejected by
1. The wronging of others
I am still reading Eric Metaxas’ outstanding biography of 20th-century pastor Dietrich Bonhoeffer who died at the hands of the Nazis for his part in the resistance movement. I was hoping to be done before now. I hope to be done this week.
This can only mean one thing.
Private Intelligence Companies and the Provision of Violence
had our final closing assembly with the students. We then worked with the teachers
Okay, so enough about the history lesson. I used the national colors of Britain for my card, combining them with a good dose of kraft. The bottom layer is Night of Navy embossed with the Tim Holtz Patchwork folder and then swiped with Picket Fence Distress Stain to give it a chalky white effect. I created a post card with a stamp from Ephemeral Backgrounds and used it to carry the British suffragette slogan "Votes for Women" made with Tim Holtz's Chip Block alphabet, cut from black CS and coated with Crackle Accents. I made a little ballot holder with a kraft sleeve and ran it though my printer to print the word Ballot on it, then stamped LONDON across it with a stamp from the set. I made little ballot on my computer to slip into the BALLOT sleeve. The suffragette was stamped with Ranger Jet Black Archival Ink on white CS and sponged with Vintage Photo distress ink. I cut the edges with deckle cut scissors. The double rosette was cut with the Mini Rosette die and at the last minute I cut a strip of red with the Vintage Lace die and adhered it along the top edge of the post card. I thought the card was a bit stark and masculine looking and I wanted to make a statement that women are equal to men, but we don't have to sacrifice our feminine side to that equality.
I absolutely adore this little guy! He has grown so much everytime I see him, he and his parents live in Hart, MI so I don't get to see him in between his sessions to see how much he has grown. I remember his first session where he was pretty fussy and just adjusting to life, now... that smile and easy going personality... he is an absolute joy! Thank you Wilcox family for letting me share in preserving your memories of this special little guy!
This just launched today and is very much in beta, but I think it's another potentially good resources for folks to possibly utilize. If you do investigate it further and have feedback or feature requests for the site, please let me know and I'll pass it along to the TED-ED team. They are a great group of people and very much want your feedback to make the site even better.
It's not every day - it's at least once a week - I just DON'T feel like doing anything but lounging. I'm incapable of doing nothing but sitting around reading, sewing, knitting, writing, Internet cruising, blog reading and making lists (my personal favourite) sounds lovely.
I was 23. I also refer to this time period as 1993 BC (before child) and 1993 AD (after delivery).
So what is new ? what remains old? What sights have you seen? What nightmares have you experienced?..
And he likes to sleep in like I do.
The main image is stamped with Vintage Sepia from Versafine on pale pink CS (Blush Blossom from Stampin' Up). I used an embossing folder to add a bit of texture. The darker pink ink is Spun Sugar Distress Ink (Ranger) added with a distressing tool.
So, once you’ve found yourself a nice area to set up your tie-die “station” your set to start.
I know, the post title sort of implies that I'm an addict but this isn't going to be me spilling my guts about my drug, sex, gambling or high-speed race car addiction. Maybe next time.
4. Back On Top
I wanted to be out cycling around the lake early, running errands, mailing letters. I am mentally and physically fatigued from the previous stressful work-week. Right now, in this moment, I don’t feel like doing any thing.
Emmerdale: Eden Taylor-Draper (Belle Dingle)
S)Simplicity
Of course you have made many mistakes along the way. You NOW realise of taking your own approval and agreement before signing onto anything. You NOW realise the importance of not saying YES when someone asks you to say YES. You NOW realise the importance of not going along with the crowd on every issue. You NOW realise the importance of standing up for your thoughts. You realise, it is ONE life and you need to make the most of it. It is YOUR life. YOURS only. Not to be bartered away for someone’s NEEDS.
The second argument concerns Israel’s humanitarianism, in particular, Israel’s response to a refugee crisis. Not the Palestinian refugee crisis -- for I am sure that the other speakers will cover that -- but the issue of Darfurian refugees. Everyone knows that what happened and is still happening in Darfur is genocide, whether or not the UN and the Arab League will call it such. (I actually hoped that Mr. Massih would be able to speak about -- he's actually somewhat of an expert on the crisis in Darfur, in fact, it's his expertise that has called him away to represent the former dictator of Sudan while he is being investigated by the ICC.)
There was a fresh scar of a swastika that had been cut into the underside of her wrist. The burn on the soft skin between her thumb and forefinger was almost healed but would leave a scar that would last for the rest of her life. This would be a lasting memory of her mother’s last boyfriend.
Yes, that is the last song played for The Hunger Games credits. But, I love it.
13And the sea gave up the dead which were in it; and death and hell delivered up the dead which were in them: and they were judged every man according to their works.
I will focus on only one issue: Laibman’s position on Soviet socialism, specifically, his contention that Soviet socialist development is compatible with Marx’s Gotha critique, more particularly in the sense of the lower phase of communism, the “protracted period of evolutionary transition” based on “successful proletarian revolution and establishment of workers’ power” while retaining “the crucial features of the forces and relations” of capitalism such as “wage-labor” and “money and prices . . .” The following development is exclusively based on Marx’s own categories.
In any case, it seems to me that it's a boon for everyone when the big players go digital with their records--and by big players, I mean any organization that has a body of records of the type we all seek as documentation for our family lines. I mean people who are in the records business (whether civil or commercial, profit or non-profit).
Lord of the Rings Tactics (PSP)
And the sad part of this is that I do have more important things to talk with Him about. Really important things. Things that are killing me, breaking my heart, threatening to do serious damage to my life. But I’m so afraid of being rejected that I’m afraid to put them on the table. My fear of the emotional impact and significance of a ‘no’ sometimes overrides my longing for true relationship with my Savior, Comforter, Redeemer, Friend.
Upon relinquishing your ticket, you’re offered with green (marshmallow) eggs and (cake) ham by someone that looks like a mango with hair. As you approach the stage, you can hear Dr Seuss rhyming away to his hearts content on the speakers. It’s 35 bucks for a single band performing, but I’m already impressed. They kick off with not-your-run-of-the-mill stand-up comedian, “Hansel”. She’s crude, rude and vulgar but hilarious. Something you can get away with at an 18+ show. When the curtains do rise, you’d think you were attending a play at the QPAC… they’ve got sets, props and costumes galore. Even the mini-orchestra and choir in the back are in costume. Instead of the band on stage, they’ve got the Cat in the Hat narrating what seems to be their own story. The actors play out their roles and one by one the band members are ‘released’ on stage… and then the music starts. Throughout the show they’ve got random things happening on stage… painters doing body painting, actors swinging a giant clock, actors hacking down tree props with axes, Dr Seuss style cartoons projecting onto the back wall, etc. Between songs they’d pick up the story again. It didn’t make a whole lot of sense, but it led into a whole bunch of other things. They threw a ball into the crowd and had it bouncing around throughout the show… member of the choir were scurrying around chasing it in costume, making sure it stayed in the air. More balls came later. There was a chase sequence around the Tivoli at one point. A fish was introduced at one point and then later reemerged as a giant papier-mache pinata moving over the crowd. Like any good pinata, beat it enough and out comes candy… in this case lollipops to suck on during the intermission. They ended with a cardboard sleigh full of presents and bon2s, which were promptly thrown into the crowd.
The fun bit was not sticking ourselves to the shield with Superglue. In my experience Superglue is usually isn’t that super but it certainly wanted to stick everything to absolutely everything for this job.
Hands over mouths, eyes expanded
The text has been ready for over a month, but for some reason, the printer kept smearing the back cover copy. This sort of delay drove me nuts with my other books, but I’ve been patient with this one. I know it’s important to get it published, and yet I’m ambivalent. Do I really want all those raw emotions let loose on the world? Forever after, I will be a grieving woman. Even if I find happiness in some unimaginable future, my grief will still be there in my words, as desperate and real and profound as the day I felt them.
All things considered, his new art style looks pretty awesome, so no complaints there. And considering the success (or lack there of) he had with his other series Buso Renkin (that review is coming in Manga Mondays, I promise), maybe it isn’t the worst idea to do the same series twice; it did work the first time.
And buried him where he fell.
Opposition to the Scaf has built up steadily since it assumed Mr Mubarak’s presidential powers in February 2011.
“Yes. He loves me very much. I wonder what I should give back to him?”
My right knee swelled up (probably about twice the size of a normal knee size) after the 20-miler so all I had been doing was icing it. And walking some, not a lot. And taking ibuprofen with breakfast. Just walking around it would hurt.
Girl You Want
My basic recipe (from memory):
And God was pleased . . . . . .
Thanks, Joe!
It didn't take to long they searched our phones, chided us of course for not knowing the area and searched Codie's pockets. Then came my purse. I started to remove all the items and the big, brutish, trying real hard to portray an authoritative, I'm in charge customs agent says sternly " I'll do that". He started taking everything out and reached down to grab the bundle of blankets inside. I don't know what came over me with such force and vehemence and a look of pure steel with a raised threatening voice I said to this six foot brute 'DONT TOUCH MY BABY!" I swear it was like a powerful volt of electricity had hit him full force as he jumped back and put his hand up in the air in a hands off gesture. He quickly regained his composure and said "your what?" He then let me gently take Jack out of my purse and unwrap his swathing so he could see what was inside. When his eyes fell upon the urn he had a look of fear and horror on his face, for all his "tough guy" portrayal in the end he was just an innocent. He diverted his eyes like the urn was some kind of disease you would get if you looked at it, the uncomfort quivered in his voice as he said" you can put that away now". He then said his search was done, took a few steps back like I was the plague and told me to go directly to the office to meet my waiting husband.
Eventually the backlog made its way to me and I had 4 journals arrive at my place rather rapidly.
Just like any new month, a New Release here at Our Daily Bread designs means that there is a brand new Bread Basket Bundle! Purchase all of the new sets at once for a 15% savings, throughout the month of May!
Detectives did not release much information about what led to the shooting Wednesday. Fabiana Romero is the 8th homicide victim in Orange County this year.
Jay Reynolds – guitars
Winner: @SimonJohnson - Funny and seems to consume more beer then the rest of the twitterverse put together.
I recently watched the episode called "The Seal Who Came To Dinner"--in which Niles finds a dead seal washed up on the beach behind Maris' beach house where he is hosting a high society dinner to compete for the "Golden Apron". In short, after all his attempts to prevent his guests from discovering the smelly carcass, Niles has wrapped the seal in his ex-wife's peignoir, doused it with her perfume, anchored it with a clapper lamp, and stabbed it repeatedly with a butcher knife to make it less bouyant so he can drag it back to sea. The neighbor calls the police because she believes she has witnessed Niles killing his wife. Niles, with butcher knife in hand, makes it worse when he tries to hide the whole thing so nothing will upstage his fancy dinner. The actors on that show have the best comedic timing I've ever seen.
Location: Kompleks KDN Jalan Duta Immigration Office.
And with all of the other intrigue and stuff going on, something happens that should never happen in a King Kong movie - Kong is sometimes forgotten about for moments at a time! HOW CAN YOU FORGET ABOUT A GIGANTIC MONKEY? This is the movie that answers that question.
Firstly, the Public Service and Administration Minister Richard Baloyi had promised to reintroduce the shelved Public Service Amendment Bill, which would create a "single public service".
So imagine my excitement when I came across Elle Summers "400 Mile Fitness challenge 2011" on her blog, Books, Fitness & Other Stuff. I have taken up her challenge and will be making a post about my miles each Saturday.
as it flickers and jiggles in the dimly lit garage.
All of this documentary work is done through NPA-TV, which is hardly your ordinary suburban public access organization. They have a brand new state of the art studio, with the most advanced equipment. Trust me, I have been in and worked in commercial television stations that don’t come close to NPA. Students at Norwood High School are learning more about television production than some college students. I briefly talked to some of the students during my visit and told them to take advantage of these tremendous resources at their disposal. Few high schools, if any, have the television program that Norwood has.
"Hey, did you know you're pregnant?" "Do you think you might be knocked up?" "I hate to break it to you, but you've been putting on a couple pounds lately." "You sure it's not twins in there?" HAHAHA OMG I'VE NEVER HEARD THAT BEFORE AND CERTAINLY NOT DAILY FOR THE LAST SIX MONTHS YOU'RE SO FUNNY HAHAHAHAHA.
“How do you know?” I’d ask. “I might be a 300 or something.”
It’s actually not useful at all, from the outside, to tell the movements what to do, especially with people who have access to publish in certain places. And there’s quite a few. Whether well-meaning—people, Zizek, telling us we must be serious revolutionaries and anti-capitalists and do this, that and the other. And, you know, with all respect, either engage in the discussion, because it is open—all of it is open, and we need to have these conversations, and we’d love to have more intellectuals who relate to the movements relating to us directly and having the discussions, not telling us what to do. That part is not useful. But we’re organizing despite all of it, and the movement is flourishing.
The next stop for me is the sign. I find the entrance to the road I am to take, and notice that at the bottom of the road there is a small convent, a missionary, and it is called, The Sisters of St.Clare.
5. I have a caffeine addiction (Coffee, Tea, and energy drinks)
What small things make you happy?? Share them here!! :)
I love Treme and getting to meet the actors who bring some of my favorite characters to life was fantastic! I handed out my Dirty Hands Krewe cards to them, in hopes they would maybe take a moment and read what we are doing here. After all, Treme is all about Post-Katrina New Orleans.I am so happy to have my copy of Season 2, it makes me feel better when I am missing this incredible city. All though admittedly I sometimes wish I really could hang out with those characters for real. Especially Davis, Aunt Mimi, Jeanette and Antoine. Those are my favorite characters! I also got to meet John Boutte and that was a highlight too! What a charming man. I hung around for awhile after, not wanting to miss out anything. I giggled when I passed Wendell Pierce on my way down the street and said to him,”it was nice to meet you.” and he replied with “see you again Dirty Hands Krewe!” My day was already made and it was only noon.
Mile 26 - 11:13
We both got really dirty. But only one of us was actually productive.
**Recent reviews posted at 5 Minutes for Books (I enjoyed all of them a lot):
Ben Franklin in the mist
Another tethered horse has escaped and run on to a York road – as it emerged that City of York Council would struggle to defend accident insurance claims involving such animals. Oh? And why is this?
How do you explain the uses and needs for condoms to a 9 year old and what do you say to your son about tampons and pads with wings----
That way, you spotlight the person--not their connection to you. It's a small thing, but it makes a lovely difference! I just learned this, and I'm doing it from now on.
Next time, I will be focusing on custom Skills. Good luck, and happy game-making!
Check out what other bloggers are saying on this topic:
Where before I was feeling helpless and powerless and alone – a victim – now I have regained direction and strength and think I can help other team members, so that together we can creative a happier healthier united workplace. And hopefully, together, we can get rid of our bullying boss.
Her eyes were really swollen and puffy and she had these pimple looking things around her mouth. We went to urgent care and they gave her a some benedryl and an oral steroid. Within 20 minutes she looked back to normal. We left with a prescription for an Epi-pen and a referral to see an allergist. It was a scary experience - but she was ok, and we weren't truly fearful for her life - since she continued to breathe ok and act pretty normal through the experience. I, of course hadn't showered or done anything with my hair before I fed her - so I went to urgent care in my pjs with no makeup and wild crazy hair. I was glad I remembered a bra. We were pretty scared to feed her after this. Peanuts are in lots of things and we have to stay away from any foods that may have had contact with peanuts. This means she can't have ice cream from an ice cream place (no sonic, no dairy queen, no frozen yogurt - poor kid) because we just don't know if what she's going to eat may have had contact with peanuts. We read lots of labels and are careful. We're not so scared anymore, but I'm afraid for school. She'll have to sit at a special table at lunch. She won't be able to eat birthday treats that other kids bring to school. She's going to be THAT weird kid. And she'll be a kid...she won't always know what to do. I'm afraid other people will give her food because they won't know that it could kill her. The world wide community isn't too friendly towards people who have allergies. I'm thankful we have a few years before school. We've been to an allergist and she has a moderate allergy. We don't know, however, if that means she could go into anaphylactic shock next time, or if she'll just break out in hives. We will just pray that we will never know.
Not that any of the extra actors helped matters. Russ Tamblyn features as biker gang leader Rico, who manages to look even worse here than he did in War of The Gargantuas. But at least he had giant rubber monsters to cover his butt there. Not here, where every moment of his stoned countenance is laid out bare, without a hint of Japanese tampering...and at least no black eyes in evidence this time out.
bookstores. It’s impossible to say how many opportunities I may have missed by neglecting to do any sort of concerted outreach. This time around, I’ll draft a list of schools, libraries and stores that might consider carrying my book, and I’ll send a letter with a description and other pertinent information. I have not yet formalized a plan, but I may offer incentives to encourage them to give the book a try. Times are tough and money always an issue, so they may not stock my book. At least they’ll know it exists.
When Hunter first started school in 2001, I kept school information in a file folder.
Bon apetit
Title: On Sand Island (A Golden Kite Honor Book)
Here's a couple more little slices of life. Lets start with a positive slant on CDA.
Ms. Noel is seeking $50 million in damages.
This was my first Western that I ever read. Never read Appaloosa. But I did see the movie and thought I would like to follow these characters. So I did.
So lets start today off with a vibrant bunch of flowers, I would love to have this bouquet sitting on my office desk right now! Enjoy!
The schoolgirl was snatched as she cycled to a friend’s house in Ballinderry on August 12, 1981.
What exactly is designer stuff? Would anyone use, drive or wear something that wasn’t designed? Oh, hang on, I forgot about the Ferrari Mondial 8 - obviously not designed; more thrown together by a baboon in a moment of ennui!
"For purposes of discussion it may be assumed that even if
I don’t wish for this to come across as a criticism of Punjabi culture, because it isn’t. These scenarios happen across cultures – where women are not there for other women. We are ready to criticize, condemn and outcast all too often. Even though Meena is surrounded by women she loves, most of the time she is so isolated and lonely.
I will consult my master cleaning plan:
Trinity - Chapter 20 (V Recordings)
If the word ‘spastic’ is said to be unacceptable because it was sometimes hurled at people as a term of abuse, why change the word? Why not mount campaigns to change people’s perception? People’s perceptions are to blame; changing the word changes nothing.
Firm tofu - 200 gm block
The next part was fun...placing the cabinets on our base we created! That really helped illustrate our vision! When then worked on the counter top, ceiling board (our ceiling has the annoying popcorn, so we covered it for this built-in), shelves, and finishings (molding).
It's raining outside, raining on my mirrors.
hello~
- 2 teaspoons lime zest
the blog handle of Theresa
He looks up to heaven to teach us that our eyes are to be directed thither. The Law with the Prophets is broken, and in the midst of them are brought forward mysteries, that whereas they partook not of it whole, when broken into pieces it may be food for the multitude of theGentiles.
I went over to our friends house with the mind set that I will eat grilled chicken, I won't have more than a handful of chips and I defiantly won't eat anything with eggs in it (i.e. Kara's cookie cake and Sanne's pancakes). Well 2 beers and a strong Bloody Mary later, I could have cared less what I was putting in my mouth. I was double fisting faster than Forest Gump plays ping pong. Were double fisting food an Olympic sport, I surely would win. Inside my stomach was a thick layer of cheese upon PBR upon cheese upon PBR upon cake upon chicken upon beer upon cheese.
lives of those around you? This is a question you must ask yourself and truthfully
A blanket on a bed
“With my family legacy at Illinois State, I have a great love and strong emotional ties to the university,” said Collins. “Illinois State is a terrific university with an excellent basketball tradition and future. I have a strong desire to be a head coach but after conversations with Mr. Friedman I came to the determination that it was not the right fit for me and the university at this time. It is an honor to be in consideration for the opening at my parents’ alma mater and I look forward to watching the entire athletic and academic community at Illinois State continue to grow and prosper.”
“Depends.”
Duh.
I always love hearing/reading about everyone's holiday and also what they get from Santa! Feel free to join in on the fun. I hope this doesn't come across as bragging, but simply remembering another Christmas gone by.
Are you a fan of the 'blue and white'? I often think it is a signature of classical English style decoration yet these days blue and white is likely to pop up in many different interiors. The 'blue and white' seems to suit both formal and informal decors, whether it be urns, vases or bowls. I prefer this porcelain massed in groups or displayed in an armoire...like so many things, I think the 'blue and white' works on that principal of more is better....
I didn't buy any tomatoes or beans or figs, because last week I picked a good kilo of beans and 2kg of tomatoes from my minuscule veggie garden. I can highly recommend these "purple king" beans to any neglectful gardener. All my peas and snowpeas died, but these beans just kept on going. I put in four seedlings on a wire obelisk, added a handful of fertiliser, a dash of snailbait. Helped along by plenty of rain, they are now producing about half to one kilo of beans a week. They're a pretty deep purple, but they turn green when they are cooked.
Lesson Two. Do not become paralyzed by fear of a job well-done. ..I had done it fairly well, and did not want to ruin my progress. All that work. The thought that I might destroy the picture and have to start over stopped all progress again. But little by little I managed to pick up the picture. And little by little I progressed. And I did not destroy it any time I painted. I only moved forward. The bottom line is this..
I have tomato and zucchini planted, am looking forward to watching their quick growth. Everything is growing like crazy, the mesquite trees are full of blossoms and the gardenias are popping like crazy. Springtime is wonderful.
Peleman Industries Inc, a privately held manufacturer of binding, laminating and presentation products was founded in 1939 and is currently headquartered in Puurs, Belgium. In 1999, the company opened its U.S. corporate office in Alpharetta, Georgia. With its brand UniBook.com, Peleman Industries offers an “on demand” book printing, binding and fulfillment service for the broad business and consumer market. Through a network of printing partners in Europe, the US, and Japan, books and publications become available online around the world. Self-published, short run or out-of-print books are brought to the reader in a highly professional manner.”
Earhart believes his operation is the “total package concept: production, performance, structure and carcass.”
Baking a cake requires a recipe. Gathering the utensils and ingredients, carefully measuring and mixing, and then baking it for the correct length of time are all critical for its success. Too many eggs, omitting the sugar, or not measuring the flour correctly can cause it to flop.
It is a wild tale of Jaffy Brown, a boy in Victorian London who finds himself as a child in the mouth of a tiger escaped from Jamrach's Menagerie - true place and true event, but spirals outwards as he takes to the sea to find a Dragon of the komodo variety no less. However, things go awry and (spoiler alert) Jaffy and his companions find themselves lost at sea in two small life boats and discover the true heart of darkness at sea.
I used a text stamp (designed it myself) and stamped with Archival Ink Jet Black. After it dried I applied Glimmer Glam Hayride over the text.
scholarships, professional development funds and mentoring to successful
Dissolve a tablespoon of bicarb soda in a cup of water. If you’ve got children, it might be better doing this in a squirt bottle.
Because the technology is new, I don't have a nifty little picture of what they look like inside. The companies probably don't want any more info out than there is already. But here's what one looks like:
Whatever life might have been in its embryonic beginnings
And then there was that page Brittany and Jessica and Mandy Moore. And as I grew older, the pages for rock music or rap or r&b for those years I was in denial that I am a white kid from the middle of no-where. And of course, at the very back of the CD case that included CDs you secretly still loved but were now ashamed to own.
I was very happy there. Don’t get me wrong, it wasn’t all sugar and daisies. Every school has bullies, and every school has a popular crowd. The social ladder just wasn’t as high there, and it was much easier for everyone to be themselves. I was able to get away from the nicknames and rumors I had grown up with, and have a bit of a fresh start. I made new friends, and had a decent social circle of fun, silly, lovable people.
But anybody who watched the 7-game series between the Boston Bruins and Washington Capitals got to see what was great about the game of hockey.
Hope for the future means purpose for the present.
We have three wonderful sponsors for our For the Girls challenge: Cardmadfairy and their prize is 5 digital images of the winner's choice; Cuddly Buddly and their prize is a 5 pound gift certificate; and Shelley's Images and Shelley's prize is a $9 gift certificate! These prizes are drawn randomly by Mr. Random so everyone has an equal chance at winning, provided you follow the challenge rules and theme. The design team also picks our Top Three cards and those talented stampers receive a blog badge to display with pride on their blogs.
From a vegetarian potluck
I’m embarrassed that I don’t know how to…tap dance or do internet banking.
Let your fury cease,
SS501′s Park Jung Min applies to nullify contract with CNR Media
34. Exercise 5 days a week, more if I can
These example show that it can be valuable in many ways to sensualize your destination. To give it a desireable and passionate environment which is appreciable.
In touring news, the acclaimed Flint, MI sextet--CRAIG OWENS (vocals), BRADLEY BELL (keyboards), PAT McMANAMAN (guitar), MATT GODDARD (bass), JASON HALE (guitar) and DERRICK FROST (drums)--have announced multiple tours including headlining dates as well as co-headlining tours with Motion City Soundtrack and Silverstein which will keep them on the road into 2009; see the dates below and expect more to be announced soon.
em: did it burn down? hope daddy wasnt inside it
2. Playing basketball. Last summer, I played close to two hours of ball almost every week night. It was amazing. I’d never felt that good in my life, and I had so much fun and really improved in all aspects of my game. I’m looking to do something similar this summer.
Yesterday morning he woke me up to tell me bye. And said, “I know you don’t like doing this but would you please work on the books for my business.” My seasonal job has ended for the season, so I though I would enjoy sleeping in for a few days. No such luck.
I'm embarrassed.
For example, there would become great need for proactive preventative medical treatment for all, because the longer and healthier someone’s life is the more time they have to give back to society. It won’t just be about dealing with people once their health has becomes critically ill and they can’t avoid it anymore, but doing what it takes to help people stay active and well throughout the course of their life. As well as usual medical treatments this should include fitness and stress reduction in any form that keep people saner and in good health. The emergency room worries should be about the condition of the patient not about if you can afford treatment or what this will do to your insurance premium.
46. People come to me for everything from bandaids and safety pins to policy and procedures.
- 600g beef shin or shoulder cut into 2-3cm cubes (I could only get brisket)
He said these improvements were among 22 recommendations made by the PSC.
The lifetime prevalence of diseases preventable by vaccination was markedly higher in unvaccinated than in vaccinated subjects.
8. Omoide Hatoba - "Anarchy"
First and foremost, my CAUSE is the GOSPEL of Jesus Christ. There is NO OTHER WAY. The gospel changes everything (as I hear each and every Sunday!). When I wrote about my heart breaking yesterday, I think it is because I see how so many people have not TRULY embraced, or maybe even HEARD, the gospel of Jesus Christ in our own backyards. So many hurting people who have not known that life-transforming power of good news. So..my cause is to let my life be CONTROLLED by the Gospel. I can't be controlled by success or comfort or pride or hate or greed - I will be a slave to the gospel of Jesus Christ.
And as we stood on Devon’s down
Marketers and web designers must love this.
a project that was shipwrecked when she heard
#152 lalkygirl
2. Knead dough on floured surgace until smooth. Roll dough out between two sheets of baking paper. Cover and put in the fridge for 30mins.
“How dare you! I am a positive influence in the working world. I always arrive early with an upbeat attitude and as the day progresses, I admit I slide downhill, but always leave my peers with a special good night greeting.”
But first, I'd like to thank you for leaving comments here when I wasn't able to return the favor.
Wausau CS
At one point I stopped at a culvert over a little dry canal or drain or something, under a gulmohar. I was lying there with my eyes shut for about five minutes before I realized that the smell was suddenly much stronger, more rotten carcass than fishy. I sat up to see the skeleton of a goat, shrink-wrapped in discoloured hide staring back at me with hollow eyes. I lay down again and decided to just ignore the smell. The trip showed me some lovely sights, but then the world is quite unbiased when it comes to throwing sights at you. When you set out to see the world, you get to see the good, the bad and the ugly in the correct proportion. I passed a lot of road-kills, dogs mostly, some birds, some rats and disproportionately more snakes in goa. And somewhere on the first day I cycled past this horrible scene that I couldn’t make much sense of. There were dead chicken all over the place, dead and decaying, feathers and all. Must’ve been an accident involving a truck carrying chickens, but then there were dead chickens hanging from trees and bushes. And feathers everywhere. It looked like a truck carrying chickens had exploded.
as long as I’m altered, and. nothing is still.
no cooking required either so this is so easy if you have a food processer on hand.
Now we know where the drug cartels get their hand grenades, Obama. The Obama gun control strategy is getting a lot clearer. Frighten the public and then use the public outcry as his weapon. No wonder he wispered to Brady we got some under the radar work to do first.
It is good to be back here, but I am considering restricting my online time or schedule a screen free night a week to make room for more creativity. Analogue time for a longer period is definitely recommended!
Creative fluency is the process by which artistic proficiency adds meaning through design, art, and storytelling. Collaboration fluency is a team working proficiency that has reached the unconscious ability to work cooperatively within virtual and real partners in an online environment to create original digital products.
Heroes Let Themselves Be Killed
As she gazed into the impenetrable darkness she saw it appear, two pearls through the fog. Two oval shapes of purest white, two eyes. It had found her. The creature that Alice had been told of, the thing that all others feared, and she could see why. Alice had to silence a scream when it jumped to her lips as it came into view; it was horrific. The tattered cloak, the stretched and disfigured face, the disgusting drooling mouth with the overwhelming expression of sadness.
You can channel your inner Hallmark writing soul with these weeks picture challenge.
I'd like to think that we can learn from our mistakes and that the current trend for Craft Beer isn't just a fad but who knows? Will people become bored with craft beer? Will it, in the words of Tap East brewer, Eddie Baines, become as 'passe as a three cornered hat?'
The chapter wraps up discussing the effect of temperature on gases. Jacques-Alexandre-Cesar Charles, while ballooning, noticed that hot air expands, but the law named after him was first stated by two other great scientists, John Dalton and Joseph-Louis Gay-Lussac. Charles law states that for a constant volume of gas, the pressure of the gas is directly proportional to the temperature. While I repeated this experiment with the boys, I also did this awhile back with my kids, and the video is better:
Something else to note, the beer garden will be non-smoking.
When I arrived at the school I quickly made my way to office and before I could get through the door my son who doesn't show much affection in public had met me at the door and flung his arms around me as he sobbed into my neck.
We are all fine. I did have some anxious thoughts before bedtime thinking things like, "Oh my goodness...what if this happens again with a big after shock while we are sleeping...will I wake up? What if? What if?" Then finally I decided it would be a much better idea.....to just pray:)
However, there are a few words I refuse to touch. I will mention them here for clarification but understand that I never use them as insults or even in casual conversation: faggot, nigger – including niglet, nignog, nig, and “niggah” –, spic, wetback, ape, beaner, breed, buffie, chink, camel jockey, coolie, dago, guinea, wop, hairyback, half breed, jap, kike, prairie nigger, roundeye, squaw, or towel head. There is one word I’ve tip-toed around since I first heard it, even before I knew what it meant.
So, that’s my story.
There’s a certain narrative out there that history moves in only one direction, that progress is inexorable, that we’re so enlightened today (even that human nature has changed), whereas in ages past humanity lived in unspeakable darkness and ignorance. That’s incorrect.
Ever booked a summer vacation, then felt that sinking feeling as you watched your ticket prices plummet before you fly?
(Dry coarse skin, dermatitis, hyperpigmentation and eczema can be a symptom of Hypocalcemia (calcium deficiency) according to the Cleveland Clinic and it looks as if this was a reason (or maybe the reason) why ‘Timan’s eczema kept flaring up.)
Here I am, posting another muffin recipe. They’re still my go-to dessert because they’re easy to “healthify.” Muffins don't need frosting, and it’s easy to cut sugar and fat and add good fats along with whole grains. Yep, for me, the muffin is king.
The cravings for a giant glass of white wine that plagued me at the beginning of my pregnancy have been replaced with the craving for a giant caramel latte. Several times daily. (I would seriously mainline if I thought it would satisfy me, at this point.) Don’t get me wrong, internet, I need that giant white wine now more than I have ever needed a giant cocktail. Because I believe that my tolerance is now such that it might completely knock me out and shave a few hours off of this torturous game of “Waiting for Baby Without Murdering Anyone”.
Rocking Sheep- Tap the sheep very lightly and they will gently rock from side to side. (The Grolier Kids Crafts Craft Book by Cheryl Owen, page 18 & 19).
*aka stands for “also known as” (some people don’t know this!)
Bond laughed. "When I'm . . . er . . . concentrating," he explained, "I never have more than one drink before dinner. But I do like that one to be large and very strong and very cold and very well-made. I hate small portions of anything, particularly when they taste bad. This drink's my own invention. I'm going to patent it when I can think of a good name."
We stopped outside a convenience store and she went in leaving me and my companion standing outside. I found that I had to make a decision. I could stand outside the shop with lots of guys around or I could take a big step and go inside. I've never been inside a shop as Jenny, of course I was currently walking through an area of Bristol that I'd probably not have gone through in boy mode. I looked at my companion and both of us decided to go inside.
I am really enjoying the blogging process, BTW. It's great to share the positive experiences I come upon while teaching. But...one thing is missing. YOUR COMMENTS:) Please tell me what's on your mind! Or just say hello. Or whatever! Better yet, follow the blog AND comment! Ya' know, in between lesson planning, hanging artwork, and teaching...
I sincerely hope what the Senator said was distorted, but I doubt it as I had the pleasure of presenting on political rape to the Senate Gender and Development Thematic Committee a couple of years ago and one of the senators said that men are not animals, they do not gang rape, thankfully this was totally discounted by the female members of the committee. The calibre of some of our senators is appalling; in the next election, let us vote in men and women of substance, please.
Then I find out it’s about a boy whose mom is dying of cancer and whose dad has another family in a different country. Far from being a simple haunted house (monster-infested house?) story, Monster is about a monster who forces the boy to face the truth of his situation. What is that truth? You’ll have to read the book to find out. But it’s a truth that definitely, painfully, hit home for me.
If nothing else you can be like me and realize I haven't changed my polling place since the ice age, and I have no desire to be cast a drift on icy seas... so tomorrow I'll fix that.
"Li'l Red Riding Hood" by Sam the Sham & the Pharaohs
a crushed heart? From depression? From dependence on unhealthy substances?
But thanks to the majority of gun-owners apparently not giving a damn enough to join a pro-gun organization, not only do videos like this exist. . . they are indicative of what the future may very well hold for us.
As could be expected the photographs were amazing, and well-curated with small explanations next to each in English and Serbian. However the proceedings were just a teensy bit odd in my opinion. After all, its exciting to sign a convention and draft a law, but it doesn't mean much if the convention isn't implemented and the law isn't even put up for a vote. The speeches made it seem as though reducing statelessness in Serbia is a done deal, when in fact the real work hasn't even begun.
I mean, our heroes are rarely “mean-spirited” and “bony-faced”.
And it's not your business anyway
Becoming still with ambiguity
Well ... glad you want to know. :-)
(Fresh) basil and/ or oregano
This is the original 24"x8" acrylic painting - a very unique vertical shape that is easy to find space for - on 2" deep craded masonite, ready to HANG!
I think it needs something, I'm just not sure what.
“We’ve given ourselves a real task at the Etihad. We’ll go there only three points ahead. We’ve given City the inititative, there’s no question about that. It makes the game at the Etihad Stadium a really important game now. It makes it the title decider really. We make it hard for ourselves but we have to go there knowing we’re capable of getting a result. We need to get a result now at the Etihad, there’s no question about that. There’s no reason why we can’t do that. There’s been an expectancy from City that this could be their decider. But it’s our decider too. There will be a reaction from us obviously. There’s no question about that. A derby game next Monday against City would always have been a derby game of the highest proportions.”
Though, I didn't want to think about composition or the poses. I went through those beautiful line art works and saw the little angels. PERFECT! Now is the time.
“The ability of carriers to negotiate rates, routes and service with our shippers is very important to us,” said ATA Chairman Barbara Windsor, president and CEO of Hahn Transportation. “Federal regulation in this area would directly affect shipping rates and would significantly change the playing field for carriers and shippers.”
I am entering this card in:
"It's dry!"
I walked in around 5:15PM, and they were just getting the restaurant in order, and ready for tonight's dinner service. I was greeted by French hostess Melissa, and grabbed a seat at the bar, for a glass of Cotes du Rhone as I waited for Joe. In this case it was an '07 Mas des Roches, and who can complain really at a NYC restaurant.
I’ve been thinking a lot lately about how easily life slips away, one moment we exist upon this earth the next we are nothing more than a fragmented soul. Life isn’t appreciated by most people, I suppose it relates to the fact that they don’t understand the meaning of life. In my opinion life has whatever meaning we give it, just like each of us have names so does our world.
Including Xara, Glenn and Cat.
Stand up and be counted
"There are several highly suitable sites in the Radstock area, but this is not one of them."
and Your love is so true.
Unchanging, yet so like our perishing earth,
Crime and Delinquency Council Issues Annual Media Awards
skate tightener
Sanctify and purify me so that I might become as vessel of honor. Amen.
The club sits heavy in his pocket. An old-style truncheon, buried deep, a reassuring weight, familiar at his side. He sits in the car and smooths back his thinning hair, building up the courage. His hands are trembling as he forces them to obey, wrenches open the door and walks, briskly to the front door through the drifting mist of autumn drizzle.
I ended up finishing mulching my garden early enough that I had time to actually sit around. I found I just couldn't do it so I laced up the old tennis shoes and marched my lil hiney outside in hopes of getting a little running time in. I have that wonderful MapMyRun app so I decided to put it to good use. I got a good workout in alright, but the best part, my dog AND cat both hitch hiked with me. Yup, re-read that, my cat joined in on the fun. Have you ever heard of a cat going for a jog with you?! She amazingly kept up with us the whole time too, either meaning I didn't run fast enough or she's in shape (after just having kitties within the past two days!?). Best part of the whole trip, when we got back she was panting just like the dog!!
I get the sense that this happens in friendships too.
Meanwhile melt the butter in a microwave and mix in the garam masala, curry powder, salt and pepper. tip the peanuts and sultanas into a bowl, add the baked chickpeas, pour over the spiced butter and stir everything well to coat.
I’ve puzzled ’til my puzzler was sore, and only one thing really makes sense: the very pointlessness of it all must be the point to Zachriel. There’s a dull commonality to how he approaches the topic and how he demands that all others approach it. For all the talk about saving the world, it involves no actual volition on the part of those who will actually do the nuts-and-bolts saving on a daily basis – they won’t choose, they’ll be herded. They in fact will be like Zachriel, or be Zachriel, who seems to be a group identity.
In the history of contemporary Vietnam, I can hardly find a Communist leader that I actually admire; Ho Chi Minh had us fooled in the past, making us think that he had Vietnam’s interest in mind; Le Duan was a hardline Communist, installing harsh, Stalinist policies that created much suffering for the Vietnamese people. After these men, I can honestly say that no Vietnamese leader within the past 20 years has done anything to help Vietnam.
The problem was that, after months or even years spent researching and planning, the thought of returning home from a two-week viewing trip with nothing to show for it was inconceivable.
I recently read a blog about how we need to eliminate Twitterspeak and other forms of butchering the English language from our lexicon. Ok yes it’s true that these terms are often silly, hard to understand and often just plain annoying, but I don’t agree that they need to be eliminated altogether.
Rejecting that argument, the judge said Sharifi's background and flight from the Taliban was not an excuse for violence, telling the Afghan: 'You well knew the victim was not consenting to the act of sexual penetration you performed.'
Some people add 1/2-1 t. turmeric to ramp up the “golden chicken soup” look.
Holly (Viva Bianca) has decided to retire from high-class hooking and fly to Paris, thus also escaping psycho regular Ligurian (a convincingly dead-eyed Peter Docker). Meanwhile, 17-year-old Shay (Hanna Mangan Lawrence), a country runaway, arrives broke in Kings Cross. She’s trying her luck at the kerbside when she meets Holly, who needs a brunette for one last, high-paying three-way. Then they witness a murder, and find themselves on the run from the killer.
Manuscript word count: 23,000
motion you to come through
‘You don’t actually know me.’, my wife continues, ‘You met me depressed, with all those problems. You took them on, carried them for me. Supported me through pregnancy, birth, sickness, everything. You married me. Started a family. With me, a stranger. Why?’
The process is often overlooked. We, as a society, place so much value in the done, and so little value on the doing.
The body has to enter into its own darkness in order to find the light. The light is in the darkness. I had to accept that I had lost, and I had to let myself fall. I died. But somehow, be it faith or God or some divine intervention, I was becoming whole. And I’d never been whole in my life. I realized I had curled up in my own wounds and shadows and I faced utter fear and terror, and because of that sacrifice to my soul, I was able to become from it. As I grew stronger in spirit, my symptoms began to vanish. Your mind is not your friend, it is your enemy. Go with your instincts, your soul, your spirit—that is where the truth is. I let go of the stigmas attached to my illnesses, as I decided that they were not who I was. Letting them go meant breath, I gave them to something else as vague as air and I was new. The mental illnesses were becoming to broken, too translucent, to damage me anymore. I was becoming, at last, enough.
got the New Deal and all those meat inspectors
I will not be blogging as much, and I rarely have time to blog read- so if I don't comment back on your blog and that offends you, I am sorry. I just don't have much time anymore. I reply back to comments via email often though-so if your settings are such that I can send you back a reply then you may hear from me.
3/4 teaspoon kosher salt, plus more to taste
A Rough Shoot may have been written in haste for a cheque, but it's that very haste which lends the novel(la) its frantic pace. The story barrels along in a giddying fashion, barely pausing from incident to incident and all culminating in a mad dash for London by road and rail. But Household still finds time to paint a vivid picture of postwar English rural life. The author's persistent theme of the wild countryside as a place of refuge, so memorably depicted in Rogue Male when the anonymous hero-narrator – later named Raymond Ingelram – goes to ground in his burrow in Dorset, is evident here too: Taine clearly views his shoot as his haven – and woe betide anyone who disturbs it. But Household also includes wonderful, fleeting vignettes of country living, with all its peculiarities and idiosyncracies. Early on Taine lunches "at a remote pub overlooking the Blackmoor Vale, where the landlord, who was a friend of mine, always had something solid to eat which food controllers had never heard of. On this occasion it was a badger ham, and very good it was."
I am so happy about the Top Chef finale. I don't want to spoil it in case there's anybody who hasn't watched it yet, but I really thought the other person was going to win and it was making me nervous! I'm glad the one I was rooting for pulled it through!
We decided to move back to the Okanagan (Vernon) and his mom set up an apartment for us: We just had to find work to pay the bills. I did find a part time job right away but Steven would take the SUV and go to Kelowna to meet friends, to drink, to smoke pot, to be gone all night long.
they have a little kid play area; it is a godsend.
“Why did no one phone to check, like they usually do?”
IAN: It's a fantasy alternative history of World War II, with superpowers, warlocks, spies, demons, and explosions. It's about the human costs of war, both in battle and behind the scenes. (Sometimes I say "superheroes" instead of "superpowers", but I looked ahead to your next question and cheated.) My friend Daniel Abraham calls it an adventure story with magic and spectacle. I jokingly refer to it as, "Watchmen meets Inglorious Basterds."
I just discovered the Clorox Clean-Up Recipes for Fun Site. Whether you are looking for Wacky Science, Arts and Crafts, Kiddie Cooking, or Creative Cooking ideas this site has what you are looking for. They have several examples of activities in each category. I just browsed through and there are a ton of great ideas for us to try. I know that we will enjoy them all. I love when I find a new site full of fun activities for us to do that we can also learn from and work together as a family on.
3. Take advantage of community free and nearly free activities.
frame that has room to grow, Terrell offers the speed and range to cover ground from sideline-to-sideline. An instinctive player who
Note: the maximum donation allowed in any one text is £10. If you would like to donate more, you can send multiple texts.
After about the first mile and a half, the 10K participants veered off from the 5Kers and the race got lonely (better than having to run a course twice, right?). The scenery consisted of corn fields and irrigation systems, which was a nice change from swamps.
- The phrase ‘Don't get your Knickers in a twist!’ is commonly used as a way of telling someone to calm down and not get angry.
Tsb
R = Reasoning
6. "Nothing I Can Do" – 2:30
This time we did creep across the open pasture. They were milling through reeds and other tall grasses and didn’t pay any mind to our advances…we actually trotted to them. I did have a different issue this time. Expecting to guide more than shoot, I only toted along a handful of .223’s and they were gone. So I swapped out to my Marlin Guide Gun in .45-70 which isn’t exactly a long distance poker. Unfortunate because as we stalked up to the herd of young sows, a giant swagger of a boar appeared from the woods.
No, really. It's a gold mine of information, a little history, and sewing reference. The book starts out with a definition of "couture," and "haute couture," and how it differs from luxury ready-to-wear. The author also states that she doesn't "dumb down" these techniques for home sewers, but shows the full, sometimes complicated, process to achieve the same results used on incredible gowns of both past and present.
Despite President Clinton’s claim that the 1994 invasion was to “restore democracy,” Haiti has almost always been ruled by strongmen. Of the 40 rulers of Haiti from it’s independence to the 1994 invasion, only four left office peacefully. Most of the rest were either murdered, ousted in coups, or fled into exile (see chart). In 1957 and in 1988 there were four different regimes in a single year. In 1999 then-president René Preval “postponed” elections five times and refused to call Parliament into session. He ruled by decrees enforced by the 6,000-man Haitian National Police. That year the UN accused the police of committing over 500 serious crimes, including 50 murders.
Jennie Jerome was the second daughter of Leonard and Clarissa Jerome. Though born in Brooklyn, the lion’s share of her childhood was spent in Manhattan. The family was installed at a grand mansion on Madison and 26th Street by the late 1850s, but before Jennie was old enough to make her debut in society, she was living in Europe with her mother and two sisters.
“He’s trespassing, you’re breaking the law, and you’re sorry,” the officer said, shaking his head and turning from me to the homeless man. I felt dismissed and pulled away.
We also have 3 guest designers joining us this month with even month. Thank you ladies for joining us! As usual, there are prizes to be won from our sponsors if you join in with us this month. Here are the details.
Too many, too near each other in time.
Hey can we go by walking (Do you prefer to go live the normal life?)
After we devoured an insane amount of food in a short period of time we went back to my parents' hotel to hang out since Cakes was leaving the next morning.
Oct 09 2008 Las Vegas, NV @ Beauty Bar
I placed some more river birch wood in this basket beside the vintage 'showshoe' chair of my mother-in-laws. I love buffalo check. This blanket was a gift from my sister!
(8) “I did read it and I don’t agree with anything he had to say!” Why are you telling me this? Like I care. Don’t listen to my book reviews if you dislike them so much. Really I don’t understand people who keep coming back to be infuriated because they disagree with me and want to express their displeasure. I can understand trying to keep up with people you disagree with so that you can consider new idea…but I just don’t get the childish need seek out and bully those you disagree with.
Yes. Composite post. Will contain images from last year. Don't get upset about it, it's only in good fun!
Actually, what's important is whether the bookings deliver profits. It's still unclear if the number of events, and sponsorship revenue, will meet expectations.
(Unexplained item in the Bagging Area. Remove. Oh, that’ll be a book, tsk.)
(Don’t you wanna ride)
While the March 11th tsunami caused the Japanese stock index, the Nikkei 225, to drop as far as 10% in the wake of the crisis, foreign investors saw this as an opportunity to buy shares in the Nikkei at historically low prices. Investors believe stock prices will rise back to pre-crisis levels relatively quickly once the reconstruction process has begun. Therefore buying Nikkei shares at current discount prices has the chance to turn into a hefty profit for investors. This investment forecast is being supported by one of the world’s wealthiest investors, Warren Buffet. Buffet sees the tsunami as an extraordinary event that will only effect the short term growth of the Japanese economy. Other investors, such as CNBC’s Jim Kramer, believe investing in American construction companies like Caterpillar is a great opportunity to make a profit, as this company will be in high demand in Japan during the reconstruction process.
COOK on LOW 4 to 6 hours or until liquid is absorbed. Sprinkle with remaining cheeses; let stand, covered, 10 min. or until melted.
Those heroes that shed their blood and lost their lives...
Salt is incapacitatin’
The answer lies in landscape, in what landscape means and how it functions, the critique of both landscape as a picture to be composed and as a space to be navigated. In both exhibitions, in different cultural contexts and for different reasons, the idea of the picturesque is played down and abandoned in favor of something else. For O’Sullivan, the end of the picturesque comes by simply presenting the facts. For Sone, the picturesque is opened up into a livable environment and then critiqued by the very materials that are used in its construction.
While the ship hit the rocks, you'll find the kit not quite so shocking...12 800 x 800 papers and 40 unique elements.
All in all its good to see new stuff from Allendale, Tom, Rob's beer quest salutes you. And it just goes to show how the current North East brewing scene is evolving in the right direction. New brewers, new pubs (with bigger beer ranges) new beers, new beer styles, craft keg the list goes on. A world apart from back when I was a lad and most Geordies associated local beer with 'The Fed' or 'Newky Broon'. The likes of Durham and newcomers Tynebank are constantly pushing on the extreme ideas front. Wylam and Jarrow have been tuning up the hops lately, and newcomers like Ouseburn Valley and Scottish Borders bring their own brewing styles and beers to the table. Though as much as I big up the new kids on the block, I don't think Geordie beer would be Geordie beer without old timers like Mordue and Big Lamp.
Heat the oil in your skillet on medium high. Add potatoes, onions, and seasoning and cook until tender. Crack eggs over the potato mix so that they look like fried eggs on top. Cook until eggs are done to desired consistency (I like mine all the way done). Add ham and spinach and cook until spinach is just withered, but heated through. You may cover this too, but I didn't need to. Everything cooks so it is like a casserole from a skillet. I didn't add any salt. It didn't need any!
She even conned Losh into playing with her. Here they are playing airplane. Abby is the pilot and they are taking off. (BTW That is not just a tiny shirt and short shorts. Its her bathing suit).
I like my princesses in paper bags.
Pewter & Sage is hosting another Mood Board Monday...this time, the theme is "beautiful bedding." Specifically, we were given a few different bedding options to choose from, then we were to create a bedroom around our choice.
As I made this offer I realised that perhps this time around it would be better off to take my solicitor/barrister with me and I made the following proposal to Mr Zia: That I would come down to the station with my solicitor just as soon as I could find out what time he was available. This was agreeable to Mr Zia and he commented that it was very advisable to have my solicitor with me.
The film has been plagued by tragedy involving it’s young actors.
So after several years of trial and error (and yes, I am a slow learner), I’ve decided that five is the magic number, the optimal number of projects I can keep active at one time. This doesn’t meant that I am actively working on all five at once, it just means these these five are the ones I’m allowed to work on. And I stick Post-Its with their names on the shelf above my computer to remind me which ones are current, just to keep myself honest.
Castle De-Bittered Black 2 oz.
A Rule is to Break: A Child's Guide to Anarchy by John Seven and Jana Christy Seven, being a picture book, I read reasonably quickly, though I did take a bit of time on each page to fully admire the wonderfully charming artwork. I've long admired Jana's art, how gorgeous and organic it feels, the colours and textures and style... It's just lovely! And this book was no different.
And we watched the clock.
Young Krentcil is in her father’s custody.
A few dollars spent on a bag of latex balloons and rolls of streamers can have a big impact on your party. These colorful decorations are inexpensive and very festive. Instead of using helium, save money by blowing balloons up yourself the old-fashioned way (with your mouth!). Tape balloons to your walls & furniture or simply let them float on the float in a big pile. Kids love tossing around blown up balloons.
True to my gift, my craft
Dr Vandana Shiva is speaking at the Sydney Opera House for the City of Sydney Peace Prize.
I have been a proud owner of Rose's Heavenly Cakes cookbook for quite a while now and have tested and loved many a recipe within those gorgeous bound pages.
I have started doing some serious research on this child's nursery. I have so many ideas and things I LOVE. This time around is so different than with Makenzie. All I wanted was over the top, bold, bright, far to much to look at, room. I didn't quite accomplish all of that before or during her little life but that was the goal. With this one. All I want is simple, clean, different, unique, calm. I want color but not much. I am inlove with Grey and White as the main focus and doing other things to bring color in. We are still in a debate whether to use Makenzie's furniture or not. I thought I was okay with it at one point but I'm really having a hard time. But it doesn't make sense to buy all new stuff. I don't know. The biggest issue right now is we just don't know where we will be living. We could get renters and be out of our place next week. Or we will be in our condo for the rest of our lives. I have no idea. So I'm not really going to be doing much decorating. I want to get stuff that can be used anywhere we are. I am thinking of decor and trying to get inspiration. The colors I love to pair with grey and white are--
The Cultural Tour of Rajasthan, each City of Rajasthan is rich in culture, this tour is a medium of introducing the cultural heritage of this state to the world. The tour package is for 15 days and 16 nights, the package starts from the capital of India that is Delhi moving towards Rajasthan starting from the city of Marwada, Bikaner, Jaisalmer, Jodhpur, Kumbhalgar, Udaipur, Kota, Bundi, Ranthambore, Jaipur and finally back to Delhi. The package includes your daily breakfast during the tour, pickups and drops from the airport, railway stations and hotel, all state taxes, parking and other fees, accommodations charges, traditional Rajasthani dinner at ethnic resorts and other facilities.
For one thing, I told people I was going to write a novel and started posting chapters of the rough draft on my blog. If I give up somewhere along the way, I’m going to look pretty stupid and I’m as opposed to embarrassment as the next guy.
So much for Joseph-Ignace Guillotin.
I just got excited about this and wanted to share!
From Emmitsburg, Maryland, just below the Mason-Dixon Line, we rolled through the orchards for three hours before making the first climb over South Mountain, where the trees aren’t yet shooting leaves. In the afternoon, we ascended Kings Gap, where a stone mansion built in 1908 by steel magnate James McCormick Cameron overlooks the Cumberland Valley, then took a steep climb over South Mountain to Pine Grove Furnace, the midpoint of the Appalachian Trail, and then rose steadily through Michaux State Forest over Piney Mountain. It was on the South Mountain ascent that we encountered the sign: “On this spot were found three babes in the woods, Nov. – 24 – 1934.” (Yeah? What happened then? As in most things, just look on Google.)
hugs again Liz xx
WS: I’ve often toyed with the idea of writing a WWII novel, and did a little research in that area, but it’s always felt like there was just too much immersion required, and too many opportunities to get things wrong. I would like to get back at some point to a novel with a strong moral center, and at least one clear-cut good guy (or girl). Writing about Crissa’s world can take you to some pretty dark places.
Mr. L Andre Monteil – Chairman
154. Hand full of Chocolate chips @ Mom & Dad’s house (Pottstown, PA) 5:05 p.m.
Again, I have been totally wowed by the amazing links that have been added to the party. Seriously people, I am so inspired!
and many, many more……
Then if I said 'no' to him, you would have come up with my husband. Had I then said 'yes,' you would have given me all three. Lord, I'm not in the best of health and would not be able to take care of all three husbands, so THAT'S why I said 'yes' to George Clooney.
The second nerd replied, “Well, yesterday I was walking home, minding my own business, when a beautiful woman rode up to me on this bike. She threw the bike to the ground, took off all her clothes and said, ‘Take what you want!’”
Do you folks want to see other classes or what have you?
Attach the finished page to the paper bag journal page with plenty of double-stick tape.
1. Dissolve coffee in the hot water.
So the blessed One, who blesseth all the others,
I do, however, have some cute little baby cards to share with you today. Our organist at church also owns a baby boutique in a neighboring town and she asked me to make her some baby cards for her shop.
“A Ghostly Revenge” is fiction about the choices of spirits and mortals that cause conflict and adventure. The book is on Amazon E-books and will be free on April 29th.
For this reason, you should never, ever, microwave your butter to soften it - no matter how quickly you need the softened butter. The microwave heats the butter unevenly and you'll have some cool spots, and other areas that are melted. Your buttercream will reject you if you do this.
♦ 1) Rokinon 650-1300mm Telephoto Zoom Lens (Black)
Lotsa fun getting out with the visitors to Boulder in the first half of the week, but it seems I slightly over-stepped my bounds on Wednesday morning, so I played it safe and just took the rest of the week off so that hopefully my shin is feeling better by time I get to NZ on Tuesday. I don't think I did anything too nasty to it and am optimistic that I'll still be able to enjoy everything I have on the docket over the next three weeks: Taranaki and Tongariro, Rotorua and a short relay leg next weekend at the Tarawera Ultra, portions of the Kepler and Routeburn Tracks on NZ's South Island and then to Auckland, Melbourne, and Singapore for New Balance appearances and the Down Under launching of the Minimus Zero. I hope to have a few updates from abroad.
Stephen reveals he and Takayoshi have become friends as a result of working on the diary together, with Stephen making a trip to Japan and staying with Takayoshi’s family.
And, of course, there are important questions about how one adjudicates ancient history.
“Do you understand?”
1 teaspoon red wine vinegar
Since I am old enough, I get tempted to indulge in snippets from ancient history. But I don’t know how readers react to it.
Happy 1st of December friends!
Beer Log: Last weekend
This week in communication skills my group set about to finish planning and filming the short film assignment we were given last week called "A Chance Encounter"
Sweet music to my ears. -grabs her wolf tail and falls asleep with sweet tranquility.
I really do hope you all have something fun and creative to fill your day and hopefully the curtains will be soon done and I can move on to more fun things too. :-)
During yesterdays walk, it was frickin warmer than I thought, it was at least 80+. So, today I brought in a big jug of homemade Iced Tea. I made it this am while getting ready for work. I want to stay hydrated.
By Kat
The deterioration of such communities is often painted simply as a picture of 1980s Thatcherite policies destroying industries and, by proxy, the communities and cultures that were largely defined by them. This is indeed a huge part of it. In this period, the enforced unemployment and fracturing of traditional peer structures, based on trade unions, apprenticeships and the like, helped to break the patterns of life that had united people for centuries. However, the fact is that increasing post-war wealth and opportunity also played its part in eroding such communities.
The sky reflects on the limpid pool, only the tiny ripples rearranging the heavens dance upon its surface. Their aquatic park and playground an oasis, tree-lined and lush. A sacred place avoided by outlanders, a place to stem the arid heat and avoid punishing radiation.
There is no market for millets, so DDS created one. I am really bad at explaining this stuff. Anyway, farmers are growing millets again in this area, which is really awesome. Also, millets require a LOT less water than rice--virtually no water, in fact. And... well, there are tons of benefits. We just watched a video about it (filmed by the dalit women) tonight.
I’m actually glad that I didn’t post right away. I’ve learned quite a bit about this company since then and I wouldn’t have done it justice. If you have been to the Penzeys stores or been the recipient of their catalogs, you may already be aware that the company has a commitment to the idea of Kindness. To paraphrase the Kindness Works section in the catalog: Penzeys believes that many people cook as an act of kindness towards their loved ones. And this kindness helps to make a better world one meal at a time.
The extract below is from SLAUGHTER’S HOUND, and comes when the main character, and narrator, the former private eye Harry Rigby, is conversing with a previously wealthy woman, Saoirse Hamilton, whose son, Finn, has committed suicide two days previously, due to his financial circumstances. Saoirse Hamilton, as you can imagine, is rather bitter, and keen to foist the blame for Finn’s death (and by extension Ireland’s woes) onto someone, anyone, other than herself: ‘This is an old country, Mr Rigby. There are passage tombs up on the hills of Carrowkeel and their stones gone mossy long before the pyramids were built. There were Greeks sailing into Sligo Bay when Berlin was still a fetid swamp in some godforsaken forest. Take a detour off our shiny new roads and you’ll find yourself in a labyrinth, because no Roman ever laid so much as a foundation brick on this island. Hibernia, they called it.’ A wry smile. ‘Winterland.’
They finish the whole spring project with a book fair to which parents and all the rest of the students in the school are invited. Each book is displayed for everyone to view and read.
Now on to today's challenge:
Several pieces of legislation throughout the country support equal pay for equal work and I believe that this concept will eventually become the law of the land. In 1961, a young single mother working for a large sporting goods store in Denver, Colorado quit in protest of gender wage discrimination. Though my mother would not have described her action in those terms, that is what it was. I am proud to be the daughter of a woman who would not just accept the status quo, and knew what was fair and right, willing to walk.
The payback for many, of course, is the feeling that they are a little bit more in control of what they care about; pubs and beer. A feeling of being able to shape the things they are passionate about. For me, part of running my place is to do something I care about. To be able to create a pub that does things the way I see that they should be done. As I say, perhaps I care too much. When the things that the promoters say are at odds with what I feel I can or should do, or are impossible to attain because of our location or where the layout of the building prevents it, these comments cut deeper than anybody might ever believe.
Charlie Sexton - lead guitar
Lots of stuff is left in the air but THE VICIOUS DEEP was the first book in The Vicious Deep Trilogy and you can tell the whole series will be nothing but entertainment, suspense and action. I'm looking forward to Tristan's continued fight to find the final pieces of the Triton.
A limp! In an attempt to get sympathy? Or something more sinister?
“I'm intrigued about this concept of personalised care plans. I'd like Mr. Burstow to get in touch with my GP and explain what this means, what their duty of care is towards me. Both GPs at my local practise told me at the onset that they believed CFS (that was my diagnosis) to be 'a real disease with a psychological component'. The only thing they did for me apart from the usual blood work was to refer me to Kings CFS Clinic (who use CFS & ME interchangeably, as if they were the same thing), despite the fact I'd already tried CBT. If we're free to decline an invitation to CBT, what other 'treatments' does Mr. Burstow believe to be available to us because my local Surgery could do with that information? My GP has no idea how much or how little progress I've made and shows no interest." Susan Rogers, Beckenham, Kent; sick for 2 years
Tell us about yourself in 140 characters or less:
So, I’m planning on this being my last post about Clitoraid. For those interested in furthering the conversation I’ve started a separate page on my blog here.
and whites, is similarly nonjudgmental. These places weren’t constructed
The yellow raffia is recycled from a grass skirt
Westverleteren has it, though it's carefully stage-managed by the Belgian monks who take pains to control its scarcity. Timothy Taylor Landlord has it - a beer which excites old ale drinkers and new crafty beer drinkers alike, which elicits simple sighs from beer writers who have used up all the words they have in trying to describe its perfection.
1 myriad
Marriage Minded Mondays - discussions and tips on having a happy and successful marriage
MRR: Why not?
So thus, this post is back dated....
It's also a day I've come to dread because two years ago on, March 17th, I flew to Kentucky to be with Kelly when she was going to have a surgery to remove the expanders that had been put in place after her mastectomy. She had decided that it wasn't worth the uncomfortableness and since her latest scans and blood work had come out good, the doctors felt she could go through this ambulatory surgery with no problems. I was there to help with Ari since she was once again restricted from lifting anything over five pounds. When I left on the 25th, she said to me, "Mom, this is the best I've felt in over a year." We had hope that she had finally gotten a break with this awful cancer, but sadly less than two months later, she passed away.
Professor Andrew Prescott, Hatii, University of Glasgow
Let's have a look at my
Secretariat Liaison: Constantin Ursache
Miss Peregrine's Home for Peculiar Children by Ransom Riggs.
I had all but given up the hope that I would write like that again, when last month, a new muse stirred somewhere deep inside of me. It was not a rebirth of my old muse. That muse was the muse of youth, a muse that gave voice to the hope of a life not yet lived. This muse is darker. This is a muse of life lived and lost. It is the muse of a decade of pain without a voice and the broken pieces it left behind.
An Interview -
That's what Facebook user Douglas Armstrong wondered too. "You created an event inviting people to submit pictures of Mohammed," Armstrong wrote. "And apparently you're so new to the Internet that you didn't foresee what would happen?"
And the red cloaks of market girls
Last winter, the NYC Economic Development Corp. announced plans to turn a sizable portion of the marsh into a shopping mall. Although the site was marked by Parks Dept. signs, it turned out that the land had never been officially turned over to the Parks Dept.!!!
Anyone else going to be there? DO come and say hi!
The secret is I’ll only be ready for love once I’ve learnt to love myself.
In fact, as Treasury officials acknowledge, on Mr. Salameh’s watch, most of the accounts were simply transferred to several other Lebanese banks.
So, as a gesture of goodwill (as my bank calls it when they reluctantly agree to refund my own money which they have quietly stolen from me), I am not only going to wipe the slate clean of all negative points, but award each and every one of you a free and gratis bonus point for having entered into the spirit of things in the first place.
If I could give one directive in the political party this MP belongs to, I would ban him from participating in public protests in future. That is to protect his personal integrity as well as the image of the party. I don’t think the guy is able to control himself in a huge crowd in public.
Tattered Rose - Skin
Resentful of the way they limit, label, box one up.
Yesterday we pottered up here stopping at the wildlife centre on Rutland water which was a lovely walk, and the hides were great, we even got to see some Osprey!
Pretty soon our students will sit a suffer through field tests.. more forced labor for Pearson? Where is the educational objective for my students? Where do field tests fall within the Common Core?
To send their joy and cheers
E57
Despite the importance of microbes, scientists have only been able to study less than one percent of the estimated millions of microbial species that live on Earth. Why so few? Because microbes have strict nutritional requirements and interact with one another in complex ways; this makes it impossible to grow the overwhelming majority of them in the laboratory.
However, there's one thing that makes working from home insanely frustrating: when people don't get the 'working' bit. Do I call it 'slothing around at home'? No. 'Stuffing my face with Twizzlers at home'? I do not. Funnily enough, I call it 'working from home' because, yanno, of a little thing called work.
When the announcement came that the train was approaching all of the passengers moved out on to the platform. The passengers began to gather where they thought that the coach doors would stop. Most of the time people get it wrong and have to move a little to the left or right to get on the train. It would be good if there were coach markers to indicated where the doors would stop. This would also be helpful for people with reservations meaning that they could find their coach and seat more easily. On boarding the train everyone made for an empty seat, again the unsaid rule about sitting next to someone you don't know if you can, and luckily there were lots. People also make for the seats that have a table first, even if they don't necessarily have a use for it. I sat in a two seater facing backwards so I could see the train doors and people getting on and off the train. There was one boy who was sitting across the isle from me who looked extremely hung over and he slept most of the journey. But when it came to his stop the announcement was late and he didn't hear it so he nearly missed getting off the train. The guard that came round to collect the tickets was friendly and helpful. He looked like he enjoyed his job and probably because the train was quiet he was more inclined to talk to and help people. He gave an American couple who joined the train directions out of the Glasgow station so they could make it in time to catch their bus.
Fast forward about ten years to the other side of the country with three kids aged 6, 3 and 6 months. I had a bit of a cold for a few days then my ankle started to swell up. I thought I'd banged it on something. I felt tired. Soooo tired. Like, I'd known what tired was. Hello three children who take turns waking up at night. But this. This was an entirely different kind of tired. Then the body aches started.
Without a doubt Sugley Dene is of Newcastle's best kept secrets and well worth a visit.
One random winner will be chosen on Wednesday, March 14th, giving you plenty of time to finish the hop.
Celebrate your life and the people around you.
Being a mom who's in the trenches of raising her children, I think about the various ways that I'm setting the stage for their future. Is my lifestyle a positive reflection of my faith? Do I draw them to Christ?
The fear, I suppose is…. what if the metaphorical parachute fails and I land on my arse? What if I look a fool? Am I ready?? Am I doing the right thing? I suppose I will never know until I try!
- Carlos Romulo, I Saw the Fall of the Philippines (Garden City, NY: Doubleday, Doran, 1943), 34.
Place in 200 degrees celsius oven for 30 minutes
The revised Flatbush Avenue MPT is allowing work to continue on the installation of the Flatbush Avenue façade and the installation of bollards along this same stretch. Part of the overall site work for the arena block, bollard installation, commenced at the intersection of Dean and Flatbush in the area of the southern subway vents and is continuing north along Flatbush, eventually continuing around the entire block. The bollard work is now substantially complete along Flatbush Avenue. Other work that will be done as part of the site work includes sidewalks, installation of pavers, street furniture, street trees, light and signal poles, way finding signage, hydrants and the canopy to the new subway entrance. Construction of the plaza seating area at the tip of the site is now underway. Additional detail on the work will be provided as the contractor progresses.AY Construction Alert 4-23-2012
While having lunch with my BFF—the absolute smartest person I know, besides me* (obviously), I enjoyed two epiphanies. Actually, I didn't enjoy them so much as I was unhinged by them. And since BFF also serves as my personal GPS (Global Perspective Sister), her trademark poignant line of questioning assured that I would locate my epiphanies somewhere over Pollo Enchiladas and Fish Tacos. When last we found me there, I was crying into a bottle of cerveza and pondering the mating habits of sand crabs, where I left my cover-up, and why zinc oxide can't just be clear.
Although I'm relatively new to the blogging world, I was so happy to find that I'd been awarded a Stylish Blogger Award by the lovely Hannah Michelle! Thank you Hannah, its a great compliment coming from you as your blog is wonderful!
From the mouth of the Columbia River at the Pacific Ocean, the river forms the boundary between Oregon and Washington for about 80% of the width of each state. Heading east past Portland, the river goes into the scenic Columbia River Gorge, some of the most beautiful scenery on the planet. East of the gorge, the river travels through the barren windswept prairies and hills of Eastern Oregon and Washington. Then, the river takes a turn, curves up into Washington state, and traces its way all the way back to its origins in the mountains of British Columbia, Canada. Irrigation from the Columbia River is what helps these wineries in central and eastern Washington thrive.
I hope this season, we are angels to one another. Helping each other through.
The theme of connection is powerful. As Nora drives around the largest lake in the world, the readers makes connections to the three women and their influence on each other. The past and present converge in The Long-Shining Waters to create a timeless, meaningful piece of literature.
The other night, Nancy “I am going to dig until I get answers to my questions” Grace did it again – she showed a total disregard for a police investigation to the point of what I would describe as “Tampering with a police investigation” or even “Interfering with a police investigation.”
Tomorrow we will celebrate Christmas in our house. Next week we head to Gab'm's for Christmas in Dallas. This year will be a first for us -- our first Christmas as parents who have lost a son. Honestly I don't want to celebrate Christmas without you, but how could I not celebrate Jesus, in whose very presence you now eternally celebrate?
Haivision
I do some critiquing online and there seems to be one particular item that permeates the work of many writers. This is the passive voice. I’ll admit it’s easy to put yourself in the passive voice. Perhaps it seems easier to write this way. I honestly don’t know and I don’t pretend to understand. What I do know is that it effects your writing negatively
I say down with the Thermomix! But I do have a food processor, a blender, a stick blender and the all important coffee machine and grinder. Even the non electronic devices in our kitchen really only extend to a whisk and a microplane grater. I bought a set of scales last year because I was making a wedding cake for a friend and thought it best that I actually measure the ingredients rather than just estimating. We’re just not into stuff.
Some seem uncannily accurate, where others just leave you thinking, how on earth did they come to that conclusion? Of course your profile will be skewed if you've been busy looking information for someone else or searching for gifts.
There are many different forms of meditation. A study at Massachusetts General Hospital examined the impact of the Buddhist ‘Insight’ meditation on the brain. Insight meditation is a technique of moving our attention over the body or focusing on our breathing. The study found that it caused an increase in thickness of the prefrontal cortex in the brain, the part just above the eyes and associated with attention.
Possibly, Fall is starting in the States, Spring in Australia, and while weather remains hot and humid in Malaysia; I think the Key Lime Pie can be made anytime of year. Hopefully you do try it and share all the love with family and friends. Or if you are having an aching heart, this could be comforting too :).
men’s group takes silver in Temple Run
I’m really surprised I ran that fast and felt that good without injuring myself. It also makes me more and more excited for my upcoming marathon. I am the most prepared for a race that I have ever been and I still have a whole month of training left (fingers crossed I don’t injure myself or get sick of running). March 2012 = 135.54 miles and April 2012 = 137.78 miles…. compared to August 2011 = 79.89 miles and September = 116.98 miles before my STL Marathon PR.
Really? And what about fair use? Personally, I can live without the need to post videos I might have made using my TV that show Beyonce singing her latest blockbuster. The way Doctorow phrases his summary it sounds as though commentary by unpaid bloggers with, say, a photo clipped from a promo vid, would be actionable under SOPA. I don’t believe it, and neither should you.
He is making me crazy! I can’t eat! I can’t drink! I can’t sleep! All I do is eat sleeping pills and drink red wine and fall asleep and have nightmares that he’s chasing me, but his eyes are big cartoon hearts like Wile E. Coyote’s! I can’t seem to run fast enough, it’s like I’m under water, and every time I look back he keeps getting closer, until he’s right behind me, whispering weird things to me like: “You make the best pancakes in the world,” and “I adore the way you can finish the New York Times crossword in one sitting.” It is terrifying- and I’m sure I don’t have to tell you his accent only makes it worse.
03 Big City
First off, you can go swimming in a lot of different places. Also, you can take a picture of the sunset on the water and pretend to be reenacting the cover of a Nicholas Sparks book in many places as well. Most importantly, though, is that fresh fish and seafood is nearly always readily available.
Due to the way I had to live my life and yes due to the choices I’ve made, more specifically the order of the choices I made, she was never as fully realized as I wanted her to be, and so she doesn’t have the kind of real history that she might have had. When we, the collective of me, was rocking hardest in the mid-80′s she had to be content with being a tomboy at best. Cons and t-shirts and jeans. No Madonna costumes, no vintage dresses, and she had to make do through a serious lack of red lipstick.
I am obsessed with yams. When I was in high school, I ate so many that I actually turned orange (if only that were a joke…)
I arrived at work (court) at about 8:50-8:55 with 15 miles done. Luckily, I had nothing on the calendar so after a short break to eat some Sweettart jelly beans (I had already eaten one 100-calorie baggy at around mile 9 or 10) and map out how I would accomplish my final three miles, I was on my way. The route back to Starbucks (where I end most of my runs) was a little less than three miles so I had to add on a few extra blocks. I chose to do that rather than take a more circuitous route which might take me too far...I was committed to no more than 18 miles.
I have spent all morning reading more deeply about and viewing the work of the artist, ceramicist, furniture designer, film-maker and architect Raf loves, listened to the music he craves and got to know the available multi-layers of the man and his aesthetic taste and have been utterly inspired and shaken awake by the whole experience. Later in this post he talks about a day he drove around L.A to find John Lautner designed houses; I did exactly the same thing a few years ago to see Lautner and Frank Lloyd Wright houses, and went one further booking appointments with estate agents to view one or two, ending up in an awesome empty Lloyd Wright house that was crumbling like Grey Gardens.
Will never flow again
And that...thing?
We’re in the second quarter now with a score of 7-4 in our favour.
I wish women could understand that being respected and equality is not gained by acting like men, but following your own ideals, thinking of what is best for your future and that the main aim in life is not getting married and having children.
There were many more facts about chopines that I could reveal here, but I'd rather encourage you to go to the exhibition and see it for yourself. Exceptional examples of Renaissance and Baroque footwear have been brought in on loan from museums such as the Victoria and Albert Museum, London; Museo Bardini, Florence; Castello Sforzesco, Milan,; Museum Palazzo and Mueo Correr, both Venice; Ambras Castle, Austria, and the Boston Museum of Fine Art. Although there are a few pairs of very fragile chopines that will go off display on May 5th, they will be replaced with other interesting examples of elevated footwear. The exhibition On a Pedestal continues until September 20, 2010.
We can't wait to set up our cute little
Here's an underplayed album that probably is not what you expect - The Amazing Adventures of the Liverpool Scene (1969). Looking at the cover, it seems like just another cheap record capitalizing on Beatlemania. A cover featuring a gang of Liverpudlians looking young and hip certainly fits the profile of a low budget Beatle knock off. Thankfully, it's not even close. This is an album of free form poetry about Che Guevara, Batman, and LSD intermixed with talented musicianship.
I am sure that the gas leak at Bhopal was relatively tiny compared with the size of the atmosphere, but lots of dead Indian folk were none to fucking pleased at being gassed I would imagine.
“Ahhhh,” Alec responded.
Professor Pilsner
Represented Ontario on a variety of cross-jurisdictional initiatives designed to deliver products and services to seniors and caregivers through service integration and electronic service delivery
Is this is a justice based or a racial based case?
Obviously, these are not waters to swim in.
And, finally, Dr. Snyderman gets to the heart the matter and promotes her personal ideological belief, which requires devaluing the individual:
and always has the best expressions in her eyes.
I think I'll start lobbying now for the driving age to be raised to 30.
Temperatures about 10 degrees cooler at night are best. Heating and air conditioning systems can wreak havoc on houseplants. Try not to place houseplant near ventilation outlets or in drafty areas. Use blinds or curtains to regulate direct light from windows.
This past week, I've been celebrating (is that the best word for it?) the 3rd anniversary of our first project on this house. I decided to commemorate this momentous occasion by sharing a series of room-to-room house tour posts. It's been fun... definitely more than I'm used to blogging in one week, but fun! I thought it would be nice to put all those house tour posts in one spot. That way, when new peeps come by the blog, there's a house tour! All ready and waiting to show them where we are in our progress.
What is GQ’s social media strategy?
Even in the decades I've known Apt, it has been smartened up, especially along the main streets and around the squares. In the 1980s it was quite run-down but now there's pretty paint on shutters and stucco fronts of the buildings. But you don't have to go off the beaten track to get a glimpse of the age-old place where alleys and archways through thick stone walls attest to its long habitation in warrens of interlinking living spaces.
While this arrangement let me build my CV, living completely on Neill's dime brought up all sorts of weird feelings for me. For example, I remember when we would go grocery shopping I felt like I had to ask Neill's permission before I put anything in the cart. Plus, with taking on a mortgage Neill's monthly expenses went up. Even though Neill has always been EXTREMELY generous and never once made me feel like he differentiated between what was his versus what was ours, I hated feeling like I didn't have any cash to burn.
Up in my neighborhood we have these wonderful paths through the woods that covers about 6 miles!
This is an amazing photo by my daughter, Michelle Blumenthal.
“We welcome the Prime Minister discussing green policies and the need to be financially sustainable, but once again the Government seems to forget it also needs to be affordable for consumers who are the ones left picking up the bill.
I will try this again some time… I think I need to adjust the amount of eggs as well. Stay tuned…
1/3 cup tapioca flour
This week has been a long one, even though I can't believe it's already Thursday.
It turns out that this year's trip to Panama is a new opportunity for me to do just that. In previous years, the students that went to Panama have installed new water systems and held festivals for the local children. While both of those things are wonderful, this year's mission touched my heart. This year, the group that goes on the trip will be partnering with an organization called Casa Esperanza that works to "help eradicate child labor through literacy, education, and nutrition".
Knowing hands traced her face,
His Joy Is Our Strength One reason God may have for bringing joy after a season of sorrow is to bring a new wind of strength to our spirits. Grief and mourning rob us of our strength, both spiritually and physically.
Jackson County Prosecutor Jean Peters Baker argued against dismissal, saying Bishop Finn not only had a legal duty to report the suspected child abuse, but as the head of the Diocese, he was the key person who should have reported it.
Here's what Julie Deardorff says about the study in the Chicago Tribune blog Julie's Health Club: "Though redheads have a bizarre medical reputation for excessive bleeding and greater pain sensitivity, they pose ... Read more>>
It took me ten (legit) minutes to type the title. I was clueless what the heck I really just made. I intended for it to be strictly for my jewelry (just like the one I saw on Toasted Coconuts-- looking for link now, will edit accordingly!) because all the jewelry boards I've seen were too small and had my necklaces hanging off the bottom. I'm torn now because I wouldn't mind using it as my vision/inspiration board!
Below is an extract from his speech:
I made it back to my truck but not before a voice-over from Nike+ told me that I was nearing a distance record and I should “tap now for a power song” which I did. I needed that upbeat tune to keep jogging to the truck. Was I ever happy to see that parking lot and the truck, stopping briefly to stretch before getting in and heading home. I can’t wait until my calves feel up for this run again, I enjoyed the trail that much. I’m thinking tomorrow I may need to rest them, but then again, you never know. As the old saying goes: “No pain, no gain” but if it becomes too much, then I’ll have to rest. Simple as that. And as much as my pace suffered tonight, I’m proud of myself for “going the distance” and trying to better my posture and foot strike positioning, not to mention tackling those hills!
He spent all day painting and putting together furniture.....for me.
Reuters stuck out its neck to suggest that the attacks ‘bore the hallmarks of Sunni insurgents’, so you have to recognise the lack of flies on the chaps at Reuters: Shiites got killed, ergo, musta been dem pesky Sunnis. The attack had, ventured Reuters ‘raised fears of a deepening of sectarian bloodshed’. Amazing Holmes…how on earth did you deduce that?
Most people I have met in my life have been schooled, and my answer to this question is definitely Yes. And all this means to me is that attending school is certainly not a guarantee that one will turn out socially gifted.
Reliabilities (Cronbach's, 1951, coefficient 'alpha') observed for the scales were as follows: Moralism .9I; Attitude to Morality .76; Attitude to Apartheid .73; and Social Desirability .69.
1:00- 4:00 pm
My camera and I will share these adventures with you every step of the way.
“But no longer frustrated. Anyways. Let me know when you get home. Though… I wouldn’t make any plans tonight if I were you. Last time I did this, you slept for nearly twenty-four hours.”
7) Take a tour
Somewhere ages and ages hence:
16.In The Beachwoods (unknown)
#peopleusuallyoutgrowthis
Joe Braden: "I don't know it is just the first thing I thought of, but I won't do it again because I had to sit out at recess for 7 minutes!"
I'll never understand love, infatuation or even adoration! I could write loads about it but never really get it?
Microwave for approximately seven minutes.
I feel like I should elaborate some more, but I think "art contest" is a pretty simple concept. We here at this blog enjoy creative and artistic interpretations (as seen in the Sensory Overloads on the sidebar) and you will be juddged, either via a panel (of esteemed...colleagues?) or through this blog by the reader's votes. If I get a lot of submissions (fingers crossed) then I might post them as I receive them in a sort of King Of The Mountain type way. It will probably be a combination of all three.
I didn’t realize Australia had private social security accounts and it appears to work well for them. Thanks to Dan Mitchell for this excellent post.
There are literally dozens of complementary therapies to treat FM and its associated symptomsref 5. They include, but are not limited to: physical therapy, therapeutic massage, myofascial release therapy, water therapy, exercise and physical activity, acupressure, application of heat or cold, acupuncture, yoga, relaxation exercises, breathing techniques, aromatherapy, biofeedback, herbs, hypnosis, nutritional supplements, and osteopathic or chiropractic manipulation. Of these, exercise is the only treatment approach that has been tested in randomized controlled clinical trials and shown to improve fitness, self-assessment of improvement, and reduce tender point countsref 10, 11. Nonetheless, anecdotally persons with FM have reported significant improvements in symptoms with complementary approaches. Even if the benefits of such approaches derive from placebo effects, it is valuable to encourage persons with FM to explore the range of different treatments and thereby take an active role in the management of their disease"
Hidden still in corners, sweeping.
Pens come from the shops. Other things that come from the shops include newspapers, sausages and plants. Things that you won’t find in the shops include graddical flumes, twingmar delobets and corporeal nattttttttttttttttttwhips.
The Love Nest! :)
“Might want to check in at the Sam Bascom merchantile,” I try to be helpful.
The number one question I am asked when someone finds out I’m vegan is, “But where do you get your protein?” When I give my answer, a very smart mouth one, “There’s usually seven or more grams of protein in whole wheat pasta, so it’s really not that hard to find,” people tend to give me that awkward silent stare that says, “Well excuse me then.”
Hierarchy – All One and Equal
You have 48 hours to get back to me, otherwise a new winner will be selected.
Once more beneath the tyre-
Mothers battle not only cultural expectations of how they relate to their sons, but also sometimes their own husbands or family members. Some women shared examples of their husbands accusing them of babying their sons if they showed any affection, even at very young ages, and one woman told a story about a power struggle with her husband about her nearly-two-year-old son's curly hair. She told him she'd cut his curls when he turned two, but a month before he turned two, her husband cut off all the boy's curls while he was taking a bath. "He thought I was turning his boy into a girl." Mothers are criticized for hugging their teen sons or touching them at all. Then there's the nosy strangers who think they know best and think that mothers are scarring their boys for life if they allow them to wear a "girl's" Halloween costume. She cites the work of artist JeongMee Yoon, who has a project with side-by-side images of actual girls' and boys' rooms, entirely in pink and blue. It's incredibly sad (and also another good example of why it's good I have boys--I am no fan of pink!).
Cuppa Soup
7, The Boss by Kristine Kathryn Rusch
6 dried Bay Leaves
I live in California and it is illegal in this state to sell home-baked goods (even non-perishable ones!) to the public. I currently make cookies for friends and family until I can figure out a commercial kitchen that won't cost me more to bake out of than I make on the cookies. I'm not gonna lie, decorated sugar cookies take a long time (from baking, to waiting for the flood icing to set, to decorating) and I haven't figured out how to make a profit while renting a kitchen by the hour.
5. Mouse stitchery-added binding, just need to stick it down
So, here are some pretty pictures for you all, taken on a cloudy day as I recall. (In case you can’t tell, I’m in love with those peyote-stitch tube beads! XD Seriously though, they’re darn cute!) FOR YOUR INSPECTION, LADIES AND GENTLEMEN: *drumroll*
To better understand this mechanism, it is useful to consider the following hypothetical illustration. As young immigrants with low schooling levels take manually intensive construction jobs, the construction companies that employ them have opportunities to expand. This increases the demand for construction supervisors, coordinators, designers, and so on. Those are occupations with greater communication intensity and are typically staffed by U.S.-born workers who have moved away from manual construction jobs. (source)
Equally writing in your target language can push you to new heights. When learning Swedish my favourite assignment was writing a poem. Not every written assignment is fun but it is a real test of your language abilities to compose a literary piece in your target language. My recent effort at writing a Polish love poem shows the gap between my level of Polish and what is needed to give your language a literary gloss. It’s not to say that we should all aspire to write poems or short stories in other languages but even trying to write short pieces in a literary style is a worthwhile exercise.
The five clubs selected as finalists will receive an award at the RYA Volvo
We really enjoy reading your posts each week! Featured post bloggers, please grab the badge above and display it on your site! Link it to one of the host blogs' posts for the specific week that you were featured. Here are our picks from last week's submissions. Thanks to all who participated -- it is always hard to choose!
4. When you were a kid, what was your favorite television show?
Your word this month – Washing machine
Delivery day is fast approaching. It is now Wednesday 4th April !!! Can’t wait.
Stir in the yeast till it is diluted. Keep aside for 5 to 6 minutes.
Yes and no. If you think of an album as a “piece of art”, let’s be honest, are there that many albums falling under this categorization?
I feel restless. I have been in the same place for quite awhile now, and I am not used to that. The amount of travel that we are doing helps, but it does not change the fact that I feel restless. As is Sorin. Which makes things even more interesting. I want to travel to Europe. I want to go back to BA.
Full-lunged across the Landes-
Holy cow! I love my first born child. I really do. However, he caught me completely slacking off all winter. In fact, I was planning to recycle and reuse our Nebraska football party stuff and so I had done nothing for his party except work on the invites and loot bags a little bit. We now have a new theme with new colors too. And, to put the icing on the cake, he does not want a swimming party. Instead, he wants a basketball party in the gym! In my opinion, it's a complete party foul if summer birthdays don't involve swimming! Therefore, I think we have a compromise -- one hour in the gym, one hour in the pool and one hour in the party room, which should work out great!
Best Weight Loss Tips – Not Enough Exercise
This woman’s rescue of this guy (unbeknownst to SF readers of that time) changed that created world in the kind of “drastic” way that Love always does! Now the 12th novel in that universe is available in print and ebook, which likewise tiptoes around the edge of Romance but shows how Love Conquers All if you’ve read the other novels. Several of the other Sime~Gen novels are actual SFR, notably Jean Lorrah’s TO KISS OR TO KILL which is a fair introduction to the series, though it’s a sequel to ZELEROD’S DOOM.
In Clayton-Tamm there are 1415 housing units many of which are absolutely beautiful and well-maintained. Out of the 1415 only 148 are vacant. Clayton-Tamm features,well-maintained pot-hole free tree-lined avenues and boulevards that bustle with traffic, cash-strapped pedestrians daily cruise it’s lovely cafes and bars, its theaters and musems and all the ammenities this quiet community has to offer.
I’m guessing I don’t stand alone when I say that in the U.S., I preferred the low cost airlines by a wide margin. Not only do companies like JetBlue and Southwest Airlines offer a better customer experience and cost less, but they are profitable, which is something you’ve got to respect. It actually came to the point where I almost refused to fly anywhere that JetBlue didn’t go because I had such bad experiences with the big airlines.
Interestingly, the campaign was in direct violation of the Word of Mouth Marketing Association’s Code of Ethics,[2] which Edelman helped create, and whose major tenets are:
I sniffed it long and good – And oh what dizzying
So to the woman I saw leaving the hall at the end with a disgusted look on her face (who beforehand had seemed out of place anyway), Kafka would have been exceedingly proud.
SHOWN...otherwise, what's the point? Urban Legends gets 3 and 3-quarter killer trees out of five from me. Oh, and this week I learned:
The link for any more donations, as you probably know by now, is:
I remembered the mosque near Char Minar from the news briefing about Saina Mirza, the news was such that she went for a photo-shoot there. Apparently the orthodox individuals had an issue with her “posing” in a mosque.
Next is a dark reddish pink with purple shimmer - Pink Lady. I got this a while ago in a sale, I'm pretty sure it was reduced because it is discontinued. Let me be honest, I didn't think I would like this shade at all, because it has a red undertone and it's a dark pink... But I was wrong. I love it! It looks so incredible in the sun and once again, perfect formula.
That freshly healed
Bake for 15 minutes or until all the cheese is melted.
Basically, Chuhai competes with beer and beer substitutes ("Happo-shu" and "New genre") and Japan's barmy tax regime means that chuhai is far cheaper than beer. The story of the last 15 or so years in Japanese alcohol has been the relentless rise of these low-taxed alternatives to beer (and subsequent squabbles among them for preeminence). The new canned whisky highball phenomenon has dovetailed perfectly onto the end of this narrative, adding a bit of class and glamour (on the back of Suntory's very successful highball campaign) to the low-tax booze ticket.
Friday – “long run” of 6km + CrossFit
In 2001 we tied up with key sections of the anti-capitalist globalisation movement who had been campaigning on May Day. The common concerns about exploitation around the world, the role of multinationals and the advocates of aggressive free trade agendas meant there was the basis for unity – the basis of May Day. In 2001 and 2002 this swelled the ranks of the demonstration and introduced new aspects of May Day. Each year May Day in London has sought to unite with different campaigns and activities to keep the action very relevant to current challenges and expand those getting involved in May Day. A key victory of 2002 was getting use of Trafalgar Square on working days and the encouragement of the Mayor to make the Square a focus of activity for Londoners, as it has been since it was created.
We are blessed when we find refuge with our Creator. The Almighty aids us with wisdom and understanding when we take the time to listen to His instruction. Our prayer over His Word provides a ton of illuminating insight. The place of refuge holds up truth and casts out lies. It is a place of clarity and conviction. This is a blessing. Stability is another blessing from resting in His refuge. Our world rocks around us. Instability is the only insulation infidels care to offer. But we have a rock in our Lord.
This conversation isn’t a new one, and it’s not one with an end in sight. And that’s okay. Because we don’t have this conversation for our own sakes. But as we move forward, we need to make sure that more and different voices telling more and different stories are heard, because in those different stories we will find the common experiences that bind us and learn what we don’t know we don’t know. Only then can the conversation include everyone, and move forward.
Not too shabby eh?
Ryan was a bit aloof for most of the hunt. He got irritated if I tried to lead him anywhere, which is not unusual because he is an independent little bugger. So he trotted back and forth along the sidewalk in front of our house instead.
There's no cheating allowed - which means in October I can't write a word towards my story, but I can start plotting and planning. My novel idea for this year:
Harmony is achieved in a room when all other design elements come together scale balance, and rhythm. You want to unify the room with a common element, it could be color, texture, or a shape. You also want to add some variety to shake things up. That's where variety comes in, bring in a unique shape, color or texture so the room doesn't feel boring.
I always love finding new ways to find inspiration for design. Why not let your closet do it for you? My theory is, if you already have it, love it, and wear it, you'll probably swoon over it in you interiors as well. So take a peek into your closet and see what you have, it just might inspire your next design.
My head is simply a mess of words undone
Grokster is a file-sharing network that allows users to share electronic files (including music files) through peer-to-peer networks without having to go through central servers. Such P2P networks can be used to share any type of digital file, but they have been used in particular for sharing copyright-protected music and video files without the authorisation of the copyright holder.
Hardships ...
beautiful head,
McCrum points out, however, that when a book takes off apparently independently of a publisher's publicity machinery, there's more involved than people simply telling each other about a book: there's the subtler matter of 'the milieu into which the unknown book is released' that creates that kind of grass roots excitement.
Thus there was no shortage of possibilities for a ghostly encounter when I set up for my night at the museum. While wandering the museum at night was a lovely experience in its own right, the only real thing of note that happened to me was toward the end of the night, when I and two other women were stationed in Mary’s room on the second floor of the house. We were completely alone in the building when we distinctly heard the front screen door move, and then the sound of someone quietly moving about downstairs. We honestly believed someone had come into the house, but no one answered our calls, and finally we tiptoed downstairs to see what we could find. No one was there, but we kept hearing a clicking noise in the vicinity of the organ in the Victorian parlor, as if someone were pressing down on the keys. Now Violet did play the organ for her church, so in my heart I kind of hope it was her we were hearing. Nothing else of significance happened during the investigation, but of course there is much audio still to be gone through, so hope springs eternal that perhaps Violet or one of the other spirits of Weems-Botts spoke to us. If not, it still was anything but a wasted trip, just for the wealth of historical information (and the divine red velvet cupcakes) we received from the knowledgeable and gracious staff. If you ever head to DC to check out its rich cultural offerings, make time to stop off at the Weems-Botts Museum in Dumfries. You might learn a thing or two, and if you’re very lucky, you might even run across one of the ghosts.
Tied to the Tracks
“One former classmate…said there are ‘a lot of guys’ who went to Cranbrook who have ‘really negative memories’ of Romney’s behavior in the dorms, behavior this classmate describes as ‘evil’ and ‘like Lord of the Flies.’
Many months ago Stacie Chavez, a member of HSN rock god Jay King’s design team, would sometimes email us. She reads this blog, and we enjoyed chatting back and forth with her about Jay’s Mine Finds line for HSN.
Magnitude: 7.8
But with the Republican ‘war on women’ and the tea bag ‘war on budgets’ turning off most Independents and Moderates, maybe it’s less about Obama peaking too soon vs. Republicans can’t stop themselves.
To be sure, a few plants still hold onto their blossoms, like this shrimp plant (Justicia brandegeana). This is the first year that I've grown it so I'm not sure how long it will keep these interesting shrimp-shaped blooms. The plant description said that it might bloom into December. So far, so true.
And so I did- the research and the recipe search and how to go about doing the caramel topping without a blow torch etc. Now to make things clear, the crème brulee (which means burnt cream) is a tad different from caramel pudding/ custard. The procedures are different, obviously, but other than that the textures are completely different. While the caramel custard is more jello/wobbly-like, the brulee is rich and dense and much, much creamier. I also think the brulee is much easier to make as opposed to caramel custard where you have to first make the caramel (watch it like a hawk), swirl it around in a bowl blah blah, whereas here, the grill does the job for you, and probably an even BETTER job.
Actually doing nothing is harder than in sounds. We are so programmed to believe that we need to be accomplishing something with every moment of our day, that we feel guilty when we stop. Many of us also don’t like the thoughts that we have when we do nothing, so it is easier to hold them at bay by keeping busy and distracted. I’m not sure when it became so terrifying to “be alone with our thoughts”, but our culture bombards us with the idea that it is bad to be alone, bad to be still, bad to be doing nothing.
In digging through the 40,000 pictures I have on file, I found my pictures from that day. For some reason that escapes me now, they were wearing green uniforms (it may have been “Green Night” celebrating recycling and I think we were given CFL lightbulbs as the give-away). I happened to talk to Jesse after the team was announced tonight and he seemed genuinely surprised that someone would driven that far just to see him pitch. He was a really nice guy and I’m really looking forward to seeing him progress this summer.
Enjoy the presentation video by the camera designer himself, Jesper Kouthufd.
The project began with a rough sketch of the historical area supplied by Katherine, together with a draft of Bucephalas’ manuscript as a guide.
I picked out some cute purple frames. With rhinestones.
Rojas: Your book is one of the first books to focus on Chicanos outside of the Segundo Barrio. I'm not downplaying Segundo with my question, but why do you think it is important for us to write about the histories of our barrios?
Today threatens to be a most significant day and I am apprehensive to say the least and holding back some kind of emotional meltdown to take it as far as I am willing. God is good and I trust in God and believe that things will be as God wills and I accept myself and my place in the fullness of it all.
New International Version (NIV)
But then, I guess that's kind of what dads do, isn't it...
There is no “Minority University Research.” There is research. There is no “under-representation” in science except of those who lack the requisite talents and mental equipment to acquire the relevant training.
During the game the ball soon came to symbolise a wayward stepson – few wanted it, fewer still were able to bring it under control, and pretty much everyone despised it. One of the great things about playing football is that once you're lost in a game you forget all of life's problems. Mainly because they are quickly replaced with a whole set of new ones. These problems are, admittedly, fairly superficial in comparison to paying the bills; but you try telling that to Kristian Hewitt when you've lost possession on the half-way line. In the first-half he carried on like a sales manager with a raging stomach ulcer - blaming his health on what he considered to be incompetent staff. Mark Reeves got an earful once or twice. As I have mentioned in a previous blog, I could empathise with Reeves.
BASED ON THE OPPORTUNITY WE REALIZED
So last year I finally gave in and bought a jar just to see what all the fuss was about. So that I wouldn't be left out at gatherings when the talk turned to Nutella and all it's amazing qualities. Seriously, I've seen people's eyes glaze over when they start talking about this stuff, saying things like, "If Nutella were a man I'd never say no to sex." And I'm all, "C'mon, people, it's just a hazelnut spread with a hint of cocoa." It's not like it's Baconnaise, or anything.
Rabin dranath *ore
Gareth Porter
I Googled the woman but, aside from once marrying Winston Churchill’s grandson, she doesn’t seem to have done anything at all. So why is she famous, and what makes her a “socialite”? What is a socialite, anyway? Is Tina Pray one?
Tethered by her impulsive promise to marry Lord John Lemon - the path of least resistance - Alexandria Featherstone sets off toward Iceland in search of her parents with a leaden heart. A glimpse of her guardian, the Duke of St. Easton - the path less traveled by - on Dublin’s shore still haunts her.
“Lawless Christianity is a contradiction in terms: it is Anti-Christian. The purpose of grace is not to set aside the law but to fulfill the law and to enable man to keep the law. If the law was so serious in the sight of God that it would require the death of Jesus Christ, the only begotten son of God, to make atonement for man’s sin, it seems strange for God then to proceed to abandon the law! The goal of the law is not lawlessness, nor the purpose of grace a lawless contempt of the giver of grace.” – R.J. Rushdoony
Eleven posts are vacant and are being filled.
Imagine that you have to trust another person to care for your beloved pet. You might choose a particular kennel to train your dog, provide a refuge for your cat while you take that long-awaited vacation or care for your canary while you are hospitalized.
Daughter of the former President
Juice of ½ orange
Since the weather has been so beautiful the last month, I’ve chosen to run outside and supplement with weights at my house. Translation = I hadn’t been to the gym in two months, OOPS. The only real problem with that is I’m paying for something I’m not using. Such is life. I’m making it a point to get back to the gym at least a couple of times a week so I don’t feel so guilty. We had considered buying an elliptical or treadmill and cancelling the membership, but then decided we really don’t have the space for a machine like that. SIGH.
Apparently murder was down by 6.5% and sexual offences by 3.1%. Assault with intent to inflict grievous bodily harm dropped by 4.5%, while robbery with aggravating circumstances was down by 12%.
As you enter the church you are transfixed and walk towards it in awe looking up. It immediately begins to form an emotional response and the feeling of awe grows as you advance. This is not an intellectual proposition but a deep feeling of transcendent emotions.
Nevertheless, around 1,000 protesters marched on Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu’s official residence in east Jerusalem to demand his resignation in light of soaring food costs, low wages and education budget cuts, while at least nine people were arrested for blocking roads.
However, it is also true that a flat premium – just like the FICA tax that funds Social Security and Medicare or the FUTA/SUTA tax that funds Unemployment Insurance – is just one option, and that there are other funding mechanisms than a $20/month premium.
Every once in a while in the middle of those moments a light shines and you get this absolute, to-your-pores feeling that everything is perfect - flaws and all - and Life is GOOD? When you sit back, take a breath and realize, the clutter can wait, the dust bunnies can continue to propagate and balancing your checkbook can wait one more day? That the "bad thing"... it could have been much, much worse? When you just feel like no matter what, you are Happy, and nothing can change that?
I lead our campers in a whole group brainstorm to get their minds working when it comes to characters and plots and settings. We then divided up into groups (determined by both age and personality) and each group began planning their movie. They outlined a plot, wrote a script, built a set, practiced their lines and finally, preformed for the camera.
We said goodbye to Venice late this afternoon. As we set sail at 4 p.m., Susie and I enjoyed a Belini, invented at Harry’s Bar in Venice. It was good, but for my money, you can’t beat the Leaning Belini at Macaroni Grill.
Such fol-de-rol and fiddle dee dee of course is
I can’t say that I fully understand the dynamic for not using a lawyer. I’ve had cases where I sense the husband doesn’t want to bring in yet another outsider to his intimate family circle which has already been disrupted and invaded by outsiders. In others, there was a kind of arrogance “I don’t need any help dealing with this, I can do this myself.” In others, I felt that it was a way of getting back at the wife, an underlying message that in not hiring a lawyer he is expressing a desire not to cooperate with the process, or to dictate that the process runs according to his rules, not hers. Sort of like a male version of this:
we fall for ownership
Well, I guess I have to go to sleep now. No wonder I wake up and still feel tired... I had to work to go to sleep. LOL
Notably, CISPA also allows the government to disclose sensitive cyber threat information to private entities if such disclosure is consistent with the need to protect U.S. national security. Companies seem to like CISPA, latching onto this increased access to (even classified) information, as well as the blanket immunity for sharing information with a range of entities, even if those recipient entities fail to take appropriate protective measures to keep such information private.
Where am I going with this? Nowhere really. I'm just tired of other people right now. Well, tired of people in the general sense. I'm assuming that this too shall pass but then again...
So far, then, the Commonwealth has the power to regular print media indirectly, through the corporations power, or incidentally to the postal and telegraphic power. It also appears the Commonwealth may regulate internet and online media through the means of communication. However, the following paragraph reveals that Finkelstein's desire to regulate every blogger in Australia with more than 15,000 hits is beyond the powers of the Commonwealth:
10.Add cardamon powder and stir for a min and remove from flame.
There are many environment-related problems in the world. Mega-corporations and their pol-pawns in Washington and elsewhere are not clean on this. The paving-over of the Eastern and Western coasts of the United States and of much of Western Europe (and Japan) is a tragedy. The shopping mall and box-store pockmarks on the landscape everywhere are a disgrace. Nature in all its components should be treated with greater respect. There are enormous quantities of pollution and environmental destruction going on, on a gigantic scale.
Glitzy things that light up happen to be a weakness of mine so naturally I took to all the electronic signs. Unlike the tackiness of Vegas signs, the old-fashioned Austin signs were perfectly placed throughout the city.
Gussie Fink-Nottle is a 3-year-old mixed breed we adopted from the Seattle Animal Shelter. We needed a puppy for our puppy, The Empress. She was and still is such an energetic and playful dog, she was just wearing out the humans in the house. Gussie was just a soft black blob of puppy dog when we got him. That’s him on the Blog’s banner. Gussie F-N is named after a P G Wodehouse character who is a young gentleman who is just potty over newts. Yes, those little wet, soft, shy creatures. How could we have known that our Gussie would be like his Wodehouse’s namesake.
﻿ 5. “If you will it, it is no dream.” This is the first declaration of Walter’s Jewish pride as he quotes Theodore Herzel but this is unfortunately quickly forgotten when he freaks out all over Smokey’s (Jimmie Dale Gilmore) breaking of the rules of bowling. After all, this isn’t ‘Nam. This is bowling. There are rules. Fortunately, Smokey narrowly avoids entering a world of pain.
Mr. Kingsworth is still very sick.
Knowing just a few wealth secrets can change your life forever. The more you know, the more you can apply. In this case, wealth really is power.
Which is probably why my earliest stories were kicked-up versions of every day life.
“My house? Why?”
less a woman who used to be something of a film siren. My father couldn’t help but brag to all his friends that he was Mae Clarke’s gigolo. “Mae who?” they would ask, and my father would reply, “The blonde with Jimmy Cagney and the grapefruit in Public Enemy.” He’d then, to hear him tell it, break into his purported dead-on Cagney, “You know, I wish you was a wishing well. So I could tie a bucket to youse and sink ya.” And then he’d pantomime the smash.
Oh and Happy Valentines too you all. My flowers/card and chocolates seem to have got lost again...that's about three years in a row now.
You can't be a doctor with that kind of crap coming out of your mouth.
An interesting question might be whether this comparative peace in Europe was the result of mutual deterrence or simple exhaustion from the devastation of the two World Wars.
J'ai dit dans mon titre que j'avais imité Zoe, je vous explique:-)... Quand je vois cette Tilda, je ne peux m'empêcher de penser à celle coloriée par Zoe sans les lignes, tellement belle... Vous pouvez la voir ICI... La mienne n'a rien à voir, mais je voulais m'entraîner à faire des plis sur la robe et le chapeau, alors j'ai colorié avec la Tilda de Zoe devant moi sur mon écran:-)...
and all of you that took the time to leave me Birthday wishes here...
Whew! We made it. Feeling sad that it’s over? Ready for a nap? Going to share your thoughts on the Challenge during the Reflections post? Ready for Wednesday’s IWSG post? (Hey, you get Tuesday off! You can do it.)
Matt Cohen, Brew Master
11. The Nest That Sailed the Sky 6:42
You'll probably be temped to insert pins from the inside of the quilt to the outer edge of the binding, but pin it as it's shown.
I've said all I'm going to about When Time Ran Out...; I've said more than I wanted to, honestly. This is the kind of movie that doesn't benefit from overt explanations; that'd just take up more time I could be talking about more pleasant topics like toenail fungus and aluminum siding.
Because I'm a graphics nerd, I decided to plan out my pillow attack in a rendering. Unfortunately my second coral design will have to wait until I rescue some other pillow from the trash.
A little bonus card to finish off .... for those faster working attendees! :o)
I get online on 4/24 and the website says, "All video submissions are DUE on 4/25." So, I freak out, text Andrew and say, "WE HAVE TO DO OUR VIDEO TONIGHT BABE OR WE WILL MISS OUR CHANCE!"
In honor of my recommittment to literacy, I bring you this hilarious parody. Bitches in Bookshops:
There's a lidded teal tea mug, so it doesn't go cold on me. In front of that are the three swap items I received (see the post mentioned above for a closer look - they're beautiful!). Little vessels to use for hat pin photography, a silver-plated tray with feet...
By contrast, the low-key Mourdock’s mantra has been “capable, competent, and conservative,” a line he used last week after a fine performance in his sole debate with Lugar, and one that could describe our impression of the man after he met with National Review editors recently. Mourdock is popular in Indiana, having won reelection as state treasurer with 63 percent of the vote, and has impressed the grassroots, securing endorsements from a number of Tea Party groups and delivering a strong speech at CPAC. Like so many who have seen the light, Mourdock became a conservative in the age of Reagan; he is a successful oil geologist whose growing interest in thinkers such as Milton Friedman led him to run for Congress and eventually win county and statewide office. As treasurer, Mourdock has shown himself to be both fiscally prudent and possessed of a certain fighting spirit, most prominently when he (unsuccessfully) sued to recover $6 million the state’s pension funds had lost when the Obama administration’s auto bailouts arbitrarily rewrote a century of bankruptcy law.
That's how you spell brown!
Title: LOVE FINDS YOU ON CHRISTMAS MORNING
big hugz from me xoxoxo
* bring a supply of arnica
Many working people have dealt with the headaches of this crime. Those folks have felt neglected, which only increased when the demographics began to change. While we all want to see our home and it's surrounding area at it's best. But many have seen the growth only to push them out of their long time home. I'm not saying that growth is bad but it certainly is when it doesn't include those who have suffered through the hard times.
5 — 8 pm
Once we pick up our race packets and such, we went to the Brooks booth to get the gait testing performed. I was told by the lady I had a very efficient stride. It was the best she had seen all day. That really helped out my nerves for the race. I also won the skee ball challenge at the booth and won a medal for getting the 13.1 hole.
I am grateful for a bit of give and take, even if it may take some negotiating.
Cisco, Huawei Networking Competition Heating Up – Cisco CEO John Chambers said his company is ready for the challenge from Huawei, which is putting significant resources behind its enterprise push.
For a limited time only, I’m selling copies of my poetry book How Fate’s Confusion Connects at a $2 discount (from $11.95 to $10) through my website. Just go to my website, click on the tag ‘How Fate’s …” and there’s the description of my book along with the “Buy Now’ button at the bottom of the page. The button will lead you to PayPal. I’ve already included the nearly $2 discount into the transaction. Sales tax will apply to customers who live in New Jersey because I live in the same state.
Here's a quick video of our experiment. I cannot show you the one we did in our classroom, due to district rules, but I can tell you that the children were entirely fascinated and absolutely LOVED it! Some of them loved the experiment so much that they wanted to repeat it over and over again during their playtime, which we did, with my supervision, of course!
It's always advisable to have "options" available, if BLOGGER gets out-of-hand.
Now I’m crying. Now. On the bloody train. Not a single tear this far, and then they decide to all come at once while I have nowhere to put my right elbow.
Carrasco’s and others’ work point to the fact that the public, in Argentina and elsewhere, is being subject to a massive biological experiment involving the effects of genetic manipulation of the food supply. Genetically engineered food products have NEVER been tested for safety—so the long-term effects are largely unknown. The warnings science has provided demand a thorough investigation into just how much glyphosate human beings and animals can safely ingest. At present, no such investigation has taken place, and most regulatory agencies choose instead to rely in industry studies claiming glyphosate is safe.
And here's what Cinco de Mayo is not, despite all the signs in bar windows inviting revelers to drink: It's not Mexico's Independence Day, and it's barely marked in Mexico, except in the state of Puebla, where the holiday is rooted in a complicated and short-lived 1862 military victory over the French.
This was the second to last photo that I took:
Life is never fixed fluidity is the key.
1pm; I got my shopping done and I am set for the weekend. Food a-plenty! I am having a thin cut steak now mmm mmmm good!
26. What Part of "Bush Lied" Don't You Understand?
and the author of our salvation:
I wanted a bold statement in the room, which this definitely is. My BFF India and I traded items and I got this frame that I've been drooling over, while she took one of the extra side tables in my house... I do not regret the trade ONE minute (even tho she might after she sees what I turned this bad boy into! Love you, Indie, and I'll make you one-just not with this frame!) HA.
Unlike most South Carolina regiments, the 19th South Carolina spent the majority of the war fighting in the west, and was attached to the Army of Tennessee for a good part of the conflict.
I think they can be rightly proud of their park, completed now at a time when so many municipalities are barely able to make a go of it, the hardworking diligent citizens of Berne with strong work ethic have built a monument to their heritage and the wisdom of remaining true to their values is center visible to anyone who drives by.
Bottom line is Scream fans ought to watch, but lower their expectations. This will most certainly be the last one unless Wes Craven can pump one out on half the budget. Frankly, it is struggling with the resources already at hand. Worth watching, but could have been better.
49. Attend a poetry reading
- Founders Double Trouble
“Only those who truly love and who are truly strong can sustain their lives as a dream.
2. Start pressing your bits & bobs into the caulk, then fill in the gaps with the gems and pearls. No need to be a perfectionist here, there’s no rule as to what you use either, I went for a bit of a Disney theme – see the Mickey Mouse faces and Bambi/Faline like deer.
So we made it through the storm. And this weekend it's supposed to get up to 40 degrees, which will feel balmy after the past couple days (yesterday our front porch thermometer told us it was BELOW ZERO as we were getting ready to go to school!).
High caliber nominees included: Enrique Iglesias, Pitbull, MANA, Juanes, Romeo Santos, Shaila Durcal, Espinoza Paz, Jenni Rivera, and Don Omar. Just enjoyed a great performance by one of my favorites Pitbull and Chris Brown – International Love. Loved it!! Will they make historical trending numbers this year?
Verses 5-10: Be who you are by …___________________________________________
Nonviolence and nonharm are central to Buddhism. People come into Buddhism with all kinds of wounds and baggage, but if they stick with it long enough, it helps transform all that. There’s a recognition, perhaps like the Christian acknowledgement of sin, that we all suffer, but there’s no judgement with that. It’s more like “we are alive, and so we suffer, we feel rage, we discriminate, etc. And we have the power to transform that suffering. We’ve got all the ‘wholesome seeds’ within us, too. This means that no matter how much anger or hatred is in us, we can shift the focus and nurture the altruism, the forgiveness, the kindness, and so on.”
Ollie snorted. “Believe me, one dad and one stepfather is plenty for me. I’m not after another.”
I'll only talk about one thing, here: the architecture. This is a picture of Centraal Station, taken from the bus stop where I got off (coming from the hostel, this was the sight I had getting off the bus. cool). The building was constructed in the 1800's, and at the time everyone hated it (according to my tour guide and every piece of literature I've read) because it was so gaudy. Fast forward a few years..and now everyone loves it because it is so unique. All the buildings have SO much detail it's ridiculous. I was completely overwhelmed, there were so many things I wanted to take a picture of I think I ended up not taking as many pictures as I should have. As it is in about 2 days and 4 evenings I took about 200 pictures...
Critiquing – is an art. If you come across a person who gives a good critique, befriend them and be super ubber nice to them. Usually to get good critiques, you need to give them, so here are some tips -
Overview article
Privacy, privacy.
"I'm going to count to three..."
My husband did encourage this homeschool journey and it like all change has been hard. It took me a long time to find our groove. I can honestly say now, that I have learned to let go of the ideal I had in my head of what homeschool should look like and I am thoroughly enjoying my kids. That is not to say that some days aren't organized chaos, but we are growing as a family and I am LOVING seeing my kids blossom. I am sure it will be tough to add another child to that...it always is, but I am confident that we can do it because I know it is what God has commanded of me! It has been my own experience that anything God asks us to do is often difficult.
Mary Leakey is recognized by many as one of the world’s most distinguished archaeologists and fossil hunters. At the age of 17 she began auditing courses in archaeology and geology at university and was soon recognized for her knowledge of stone tools and skills in scientific illustration. She was invited join Louis Leakey on a trip to Africa to draw the stone tools he had found. Three years later they were married and her lifelong work had begun. MARY LEAKEY: ARCHAEOLOGIST WHO REALLY DUG HER WORK, written and illustrated by Mike Venezia, is a title in the quirky, humorous, informational series "Getting to Know the World's Greatest Inventors & Scientists." Combining photographs, cartoon illustrations, and easy-to-read text, Venezia tells the story of Mary's life, from birth to death with heavy emphasis on her work in Africa and her many important discoveries.
Why, of course I could! I followed after her, trying to master my excitement. It was a German Shepherd puppy, I just knew it. The Heavens had intervened, and were about to provide me with my canine soulmate--a gorgeous creature, better than any dog I had ever imagined.
I went to the gym today for an hour and I went grocery shopping. I played with my dog. I did practice singing a little but didn't record myself this time. That's all I've really done and it's almost 3:30.
They aren't allowed to go near them.
If you want to donate to the American Heart Association, a great organization dedicated to protecting our hearts, please click here.
Wilde’s subconscious desire for what is bad for him, and his desire to suffer, are the things that blinds him, prevents him from knowing and being his true self. Bosie’s vanity made him blind, but it is Bosie who made Wilde blind. Wilde says, “Where there is Sorrow there is holy ground” (47). In the suffering he endured with Bosie, and continued to endure in prison, he hopes a self-realization on both their parts is what good will come of it.
Now, you have to understand I have done therapy. I have done self-help, self-analysis. I have mediated, I have prayed, I have affirmed but this underlying wish to not exist never really goes away.
At this moment, as you struggle through your day, there's a whole world of people out there who have no idea that you exist. They don't know your name, your problems, your fears, your goals, your hopes and dreams. And you know what? They don't care either. To them, you're just a human body. Another robot.
This was my ballot (top five in all CAPS):
"dat" "dere" "dis" - that, there, this. She uses these to drive me batshit crazy. Great that she knows them. Not so great when I have no idea what she's talking about.
Nijo-jo was built within sight of the Imperial Palace in Kyoto, probably as a not-so-subtle reminder to the emperor of the Shogun’s power. There are two moats, splitting the castle into an inner and outer ring. Most Japanese castles have several defensive rings with moats and/or stone walls.
About half of the people in this class . . .
.... it's a nice thought but not the easiest of places to get to, 370 miles in the car, possibly 2 or 3 nights Bed and Breakfast ... in The Sidmouth Harbour Hotel ... moving on to the next paragraph...
In Close by Brenda Novak (audio)
Get ready for random...'cause that is what it's all about! If you thought it was the Hokey Pokey, then you are just weird. (c:
I'm 30 again today. Been 30 so long my 15 year old now makes my lie look like I had him at 15. Yeah, don't care. I'll pretend I had him as a teen even if I so wasn't a teen. It's my lie.
I wish to add one more. Sports.
P.S. Many thanks to those who dropped in on Dancing Beastie through its being ‘Freshly Pressed’ on Tuesday. Things are calming down a little now after that flurry of excitement, but I hope that some of you will choose to visit again!
It was little more than a week ago when my excellent companion, Argus, and I were to attend a most exquisite banquet that Sestillius had planned to put on, courtesy of his slaves of course; in celebration of his having another estate added to his collection.
“I recall a phrase we used in the field, MAM, for military-age male,” Powell wrote. “If a helo spotted a peasant in black pajamas who looked remotely suspicious, a possible MAM, the pilot would circle and fire in front of him.
Luke Kuechly, LB, Boston College
It's decision time here. The talk of late has been one of leaving school next summer and continuing No2's education at a college as school has never been his favourite place.
And because I can't help meddlin' a little, allow me to ask you one question. Do you need to evaluate where God has you in life--in family, in ministry, in recreation? Has something He originally called you to become something you need to ask, "Lord, no, slow, grow or go? What do you want me to do?" If so, don't hesitate to wait on Him to lead you right where you need to be. Let's agree together not to go even a half step ahead of him or lag even a tiny bit behind Him. Let's shoot for walking all the way in the Spirit.
Then northwards, over Queen’s Ride with its magnificent vista. To the west, the land rises through Saw Pit Plantation, silhouetting other walkers on the distant skyline, while in the opposite direction, an avenue of trees leads the eye to the stately façade of White Lodge, home to the Royal Ballet School.
1 pair tweezers for removing splinters and ticks
Me? I could care less. I don’t even notice that it’s brown. But he didn’t like it. So, he takes it outside and starts to paint it. Huh, guess what? It’s not so fun to paint bookshelves. He loses interest after a while. I’m inside, watching episodes of Doctor Who, and he comes in and asks if I will paint the rest for him. What?
and we honestly feel like we are better AND closer because of it.
Can you the crazy shine/light deflection going on in the sunlight photo? These photos don;t really show it, but the medium gold hex are holographic, so it's even blingier in person.
Blue Dream is a wonderful marijuana strain, great tasting berry undertones with a hazy top, and a nice buzz that is mostly sativa in effect. I don’t have any proof but I do believe based upon some reading that the strain originated from that great cannabis community centered around Santa Cruz. Props to the great growers there!
An organized team of specialists that efficiently support the organization allows the plan to be followed, adjusted, reorganized, or whatever it takes to move forward without the handicap of being in the eye of the storm -or- viewing from a distance.
She's a devil and nothing will change her
Rubon's: 7Gypsies
He left in convoy soon after his address.
We're actually going to head to the airport twice today; first time we're swinging through, and picking up Ambulance Driver, to take him to lunch.
HOLLY GOLDBERG SLOAN (The Big Green)
during his nighttime excursion into the lacrosse players’ dorms, he suggested that he saw no problem, as a DPD officer, in helping the DPD ferret out Duke students for questioning even though he knew these students were represented by counsel. Then, however, under effective questioning, Smith admitted it would not have been “proper” for Gottlieb to have entered the students’ dorm rooms as
But she also wants to “attend” to the “discourse” of everyday matters, such as a bus schedule. “My students,” revealed she, “wanted to be able to explain to their parents what the Literature program was about that was different from the English Department.” Her example: bus schedules as a text! “People need to know what time is, what durations of time are. You need to think about where it’s going . . . you need to think about what it means to get on a vehicle,” and to move to the relevant section of the bus. The bus schedule allows her students to think about “how we know something.”
cool pumpkin carvings 104
So I'm off to turbotax to continue my return! Good luck to all of you in your tax filing! What do you all like to spend your return on if you get one? I'd love to hear!
The kids had fun at their Valentines Day parties yesterday. They came home with a TON of Valentines, and lots of chocolate and candy. They were so sweet, and tried to share with me, but I was good, and resisited. Did I tell you that I'm up 14 lbs from my 140lbs where I was before Thanksgiving? Crud! I now have 1 pair of pants that fit. So, I'm back on my diet. I did yesterday PERFECT. One day down, at least 30 more to go :) I've done it once before, I know I ca do it again.
The Otway Coast Committee’s recent success using soft jaw traps for fox and feral cat trapping is serving as inspiration for the group.
So you want a bigger bench? I assume you have been lifting for more than just a few months and more like a few years and some experience under the bar. You need to understand what muscles are all involved in a proper bench press as well. The bench press stress a lot more muscles than just the chest. Yes the primary mover for the exercise is the pectoralis major (big chest muscle) but the anterior deltoid (front shoulder), pec minor, and triceps brachii also serve major roles in moving the bar off your chest. In addition to these three main muscles, multiple muscles of the upper body (and even lower body in the power lift style bench) are involved in stabilization. Understanding what muscles are involved in a particular lift is a very important aspect of exercise.
Finessing bipolarity. Writing horror. Studying ghosts. All without forgetting to feed the chickens. My blog is called The Paranormalist because I fell in love with the word: Para- /ˌpar-ə / Prefix. ”Alongside, near, beyond, altered, contrary to.” normal / nawr-muhl / Adjective. “Conforming to the standard; usual; regular; natural.” -ist / Ist / A suffix of nouns. “A person who practices or is concerned with something, or holds certain principles, doctrines,etc."
Reuban Randel: Mohamed Massoquoi (Pre-concussions)
Why haul some piece of masonry up the mountain when you can simply carve away the mountain until you have the beautiful sacred object you want?
And finally I appreciate all the imagination, planning, hard work, and never ending devotion that leads to a beautiful garden. It's truly a Labor of Love.
The exhibit runs from April 5 through June 30, 2012. ArtHaus gallerists are James Bacchi and Annette Schutz. The gallery is located at 411 Brannan Street, San Francisco, CA 94107. Their hours are; Tuesday – Friday, 11am-6pm and Saturday, Noon-5pm. For other information, please visit the website ArtHaus-SF.
I've been putting Brody in our bed for his first morning nap the past few days. I like having him close since I'm usually putting laundry away or doing other morning chores, and I LOVE cuddling him to sleep (only every once in a while since it does go against everything babywise, but hey, I make the rules right?!). He's just so sweet and cute and sleepy and I can't get enough.
The word I translated as “presume” is the verb δοκεῖτε (dokeite), which is the present tense, indicative mood, active voice case of δοκέω (dokeō), “to think, imagine, consider, appear. Expresses the subjective mental estimate or opinion which men form about a matter.” This verb case is talking about action taking place concurrently. So, I looked at the context of what Jesus was saying. He was contrasting where real salvation is found, which is in him alone, from where these men were looking for it. Wherever they were looking it was wrong because they were rejecting our Lord. They did study the scripture, but it was without Christ. Later, a few verses later, he tells them plainly that if they really believed Moses then they would not reject him, but they rejected him so they really didn’t believe Moses. They may have put on a show of studying the Scriptures, but it was with wrong motives and it was not God-centered, but man-centered. Therefore, I translated δοκεῖτε as “presume.”
Scream
Lots of bloggers are participating and there are lots of great goodies up for grabs. In celebration of today, I am hosting a little giveaway. It will run from 7:30 am to 7:30 pm. For one day only. Be sure to check all the blogs out as that was part of the rules, one day only giveaway, running for 12 hours.
The River Ganges flows by Calcutta. Sometimes within the water there are many stools and other dirty things which are washed away from neighboring mills and factories, but still thousands of men take baths in the Ganges water, and they are very healthy as well as spiritually inclined. That is the effect of Ganges water. The Ganges is glorified because it emanates from the toes of the lotus feet of the Lord. Similarly, if one takes to the service of the lotus feet of the Lord, or takes to Kṛṣṇa consciousness, he is immediately cleansed of the many dirty things which have accumulated in his innumerable births. We have seen that in spite of the very black record of their past lives, persons who take to Kṛṣṇa consciousness become perfectly cleansed of all dirty things and make spiritual progress very swiftly. Therefore Pṛthu Mahārāja advises that without the benediction of the Supreme Lord, one cannot make advancement—either in so-called morality, economic development or sense gratification. One should therefore take to the service of the Lord, or Kṛṣṇa consciousness, and thus very soon become a perfect man, as confirmed in Bhagavad-gītā (kṣipraṁ bhavati dharmātmā śaśvac chāntiṁ nigacchati). Being a responsible king, Pṛthu Mahārāja recommends that everyone take shelter of the Supreme Personality of Godhead and thus be immediately purified. Lord Śrī Kṛṣṇa also says in Bhagavad-gītā that simply by surrendering unto Him one is immediately relieved of all sinful reactions. As Kṛṣṇa takes away all the sinful reactions of a person immediately upon his surrender unto Him, similarly the external manifestation of Kṛṣṇa, the representative of Kṛṣṇa who acts as the mercy of the Supreme Personality of Godhead, takes all the resultant actions of the sinful life of the disciple immediately after the disciple’s initiation. Thus if the disciple follows the principles instructed by the spiritual master, he remains purified and is not contaminated by the material infection.
Unburdened with duties and frugal in their ways.
i will NOT throw this plant away, a dry carcass dumped unlovingly and embarrassingly into my trash.
This is the last card in a three-card AL run so let's get Norm and Larry together:
Over a year ago I left FaceBook and have never looked back due to FB’s high-handed privacy abuses and other disturbing considerations such as Goldman-Sachs and possibly RUSSIA buying in, it was rumored.
‘Good, thanks’.
The Sorcerer's Apprentice was very much a Disney movie. Wholesome. Good versus evil. Brimming with life lessons. If you are not a fan of Disney movies, then skip this one. However, if you are like me, and find Disney movies entertaining then you will like The Sorcerer's Apprentice. It was a good story and it was well done. The Sorcerer's Apprentice will transport you to a world where giant steel eagles fly, carpets can turn into quicksand, and rings give the wearer special powers. A world where anything is possible. A world of magic. And in the end, in true Disney fashion, you can rest assured that good will triumph over evil, and the ending will be predictably happy. The very formula that hooks me in every time. So if you're in need of a little magic and some good entertainment, then The Sorcerer's Apprentice is for you. This would be a good one for a family movie outing.
4. To Hear,
(Santiago, Chile) Handing off more responsibility to its regional partners is what the United States wants at a time when its defense budget is shrinking and the threats of drug trafficking and terrorism are growing as are other threats to regional stability.
I left room for none.
Have you ever called your husband, “lord”? The word sometimes slips out from my lips and surprises both of us. To me, it is a sign that I am getting (somewhat) better at accepting my husband’s headship and submitting to him. Still, there are days, like Monday, when the age-old battle of the wills ends in an impasse between us.
The point I’m trying to make is that we focus on what we believe to be our expected pathway that we loose focus on the why?. Your why? is more than just your goal. You want to be working in your dream job. Ask yourself why? Is it because of the money? The status? The contribution? The way it makes you feel.
He tossed her the bag and she left. One of the shorter men slapped her butt. She was about to object but walked off. Adrien stared at her and mirrored my awed shock. I wanted to save her, she didn’t deserve this. But I didn’t come here for that. Kye’s long, red hair flashed behind my lids. Ms. Valentini would be free after I expose Principal Sal. To Everyone.
Let's hope that today I was wasting my keystrokes and that this post doesn't apply to ANY of you!
to combat this the FIA have a deflection test to ensure the splitters are not flexing and that front wing ride height is maintained. In response to accusations about several teams splitters, at Monza last year the FIA doubled the test to 5mm of movement for a 2000 Newton (~200kg) load. Yet in 2011 we still see cars with a nose-down raked attitude and wings nearly scraping the ground. How can a splitter meet the FIA deflection and still flex on track? I have a theory for a splitter construction, that actually exploits the method of the FIA test to provide the splitter greater stiffness during the test.
Unfortunately, it may actually be an even more potent and dangerous neurotoxin, immunotoxin and excitotoxin than aspartame.
CHOCOLATE LOAF
The image above was taken on my very first morning in Nebraska. It was nine years ago and I was being interviewed for the teaching position I am now leaving behind. I remember being amazed at how long the sunrise lasted—I was used to Houston where, by virtue of being nearer the equator, dawn becomes day more quickly than it does here. (If that seems strange, think for a moment of Alaska, where the sun can hover on the horizon for a large part of the day. It’s all about latitude.)
Thankfully, all involved proved to be great sports and joined in, rattling and banging their provided instruments. Even the guy with the one arm was nodding and shaking his head as best he could to get a rhythm out of the shaker clamped firmly in between his teeth.
So, I've chosen to conclude May Monster Madness with the TV series Supernatural, which is not only one of my absolute favourites, but is also a show so chock full of monster-y goodness that it's practically bursting at the seams. Over its seven season run (It has just been renewed for an eighth season! Yay!), Supernatural has covered virtually every monster one could possibly imagine. The show has featured urban legends, all manner of creepy children, killer clowns, vampires, zombies, ghosts, werewolves, witches, shapeshifters, reapers, wicked fairies, mythological creatures from the ancient world, pagan gods, rogue angels, hellhounds, demons and Lucifer himself. Once in a while, the monsters weren't even of the supernatural variety, but were simply monstrous people, like murderous backwoods hillbillies who kidnapped and killed for sport, or feral children who lived hidden away in the crawl space of a house, imprisoned by their incestuous grandfather.
1/2 tsp vanilla extract
Like both Hamas and the MAB/MCB, the MDL is not just about ‘protecting’ Muslims from ‘Islamophobia’ - it is also about Islamist politics across the board. One of its main ‘mantras’ is to convince all non-Muslims, and even some Muslims, that ‘the Government’s foreign policy has a lot to do with the July bombings’ and that ‘Tony Blair should stand trial as a war criminal’.
Then there was the fact that I had, at last, a disposable income, meaning that a real holiday was a possibility. In fact, my first foreign holiday was from an advert in the union newspaper. (I’ve always been a union man.) There was a special offer for a package to Yugoslavia. I had some discussions with a colleague about a joint trip, but she pulled out and I went on. In some corner of the many-worlds multiverse, we fell in love, got married and had many children. A narrow escape.
on the way back, he was loving it, so we moved onto the safari ride, & he had a blast spotting all of the animals + bouncing around on the bumpy trek.
1. Courtney Upshaw OLB Alabama
9:52 - The candidates are asked what the biggest misconception about each of them is. Paul: "That I can't win." He mentions a poll where he does the best in a match-up against President Obama. Gingrich: They don't understand how much work it took for him to achieve welfare reform and a balanced budget (under President Clinton). Romney: That his record or positions on specific issues are more important than his overall leadership qualities. Santorum dodges the question, but says he's shown that he "can do a lot with a little": he doesn't have much money but he's still winning.
Upload your creations below.....and Let's Celebrate!!!
Anyway, I eventually took off at about 1140 with no clear plan in my head other than a vague “I might try to head over to Ben Nevis” which I’d mentioned to Andy Wallis a little while earlier. Basically I was just going to go with the flow depending on who else I found myself flying with.
so i got creative.
An interpreter was in court to translate, (at the taxpayer's expense of course), the proceedings for Zinca and his father, who has eight children and receives around £460 per week in state benefits!
splash of extra virgin olive oil
One last note...I live in Texas, so some of the proper nouns are indigenous to my great state. If you'd like the Word version of this station so you can make any necessary changes to proper nouns that might be more recognizable to your students, just leave me a comment with your email.
The attack on this elderly, Dutch-born farming couple in Pretoria was politically motivated and was an example of "ethnic cleansing", said the Transvaal Agricultural Union ‘s prsident Ben Marais on Saturday.
During sound sleep, a healthy person produces a smaller volume of urine from the kidneys than during daytime. At the same time, more urine is stored during sleep than during the active, daylight phase.
Before I begin this post, I'd just like to say a huge thank you to Cristina over at Let Them Have Polish for featuring my latest blog entry on her twitter and facebook. Many recent followers were directed to my blog because of her so thank you to YOU guys too! =) Welcome everybody, I hope you've enjoyed reading my current posts and hopefully my many posts to come. Do let me know if you have any suggestions or requests on any types of polishes or nail designs you'd like to see!
“Come ooon”, you’re probably thinking “it’s only one day a year it’s not that bad”. I agree, I’m probably being a whiny bitch but I could do without it, the stress, the white girl problem dilemmas and the screaming onlookers and sweaty runners. Next year, all I’m asking is for a slight change of route? I’m sure it’s not that much to ask for… I just would like a lazy Sunday afternoon as the Marathon always seems to bring along the good weather. Although I must admit.. I wouldn’t mind seeing Arg from TOWIE run.
we're lucky
I stroked my chin and took stock of the situation. It appeared that the old woman was as certain of her supernatural powers as the clown and, moreover, had a legitimate grievance that required redress. These facts would clearly have to be accommodated in any resolution of the dispute.
10,000 die each year just from aspirin type products (NSAIDS)
i managed a 2:33:42, 8:15 pace, over the hilly course. for the first dozen miles i was on pace for a 2:30 finish, but the last 6.6 miles took their toll. even so, i finished a solid 3 minutes faster than the 2011 edition - and a even managed to finish ahead of my 2:34 at the boston blowout last weekend!
There will come a day when all of this will happen as we read for example in Zechariah 12:10,
What’s Good About It: It talks about normail life and is easy to read.
"I saw planes, trains and automobiles."
What inspires me about Gillian? The fact that I never leave a visit with her (her blog, her facebook page) without feeling the day is good, the day has had some magic added. I feel my own spirit swell just a little and then a little more and I embrace my life with wonder and fulfillment.
I want to encourage people to have hope and to dream; however, I want to make sure the same people are aware of something called Reality. You might have heard of it… it exists all around us.
Great! Kathy, I work with birthmother's here at ANLC and I have a girl I would like to present to you to see if you would agree to be presented to her....
Peanut Butter Rice Pudding
I refuse to be a slave
Once I attached the skirt to the bodice, I realise that the length was pretty short, and also that the shape wasn't as fitted as I hoped. I did take it in a bit at the sides - witness my big-fat-french-seams, which helped a little.
This is my last rant on these subjects. After this I am going to instill some positive talk as well as trying harder to loose this weight. I want him to notice that there is a weight loss. He doesn’t know that those little chicken things I indulge in are about the only things I consume and it’s because they are chicken. I am really not consuming much else. He doesn’t know that I’m moving around more. Let’s see how long it takes for him to notice. I have been doing some extra things that he will never notice. This all proves my point that he only ever looks for what is wrong and never for what is right. He has truly missed his calling.
Relative to women, men report being more likely to increase alcohol consumption, to decrease studying, and to increase partying around the success of the football team. Yet, both male and female students report that their behavior is responsive to athletic success. This suggests that female performance is likely affected by the performance of the football team as well but that this effect is masked by the usual practice of grade curving.
And meanwhile, as the media spread their scare stories about militias and right-wingers, the incidents of violent attacks by flash mobs and ''youths'' who must not be described, proceed and escalate steadily.
We had to initial five additional pages of addendum legalize stuff about how we wouldn't hold anybody liable and if our house inspector gets hurt they're not liable and if anything happens, they're not liable and ... etc adnauseum. We read everything, asked questions and just went for it. We even resigned and dated our offer so everything is current and clean.
I am praying that His light would shine through the fog. That His voice will be heard and guide me to peace. I am reminded of Psalm 23 and hold to it.
So, in the middle of all this craziness over this person who thinks she can sell free patterns in her Etsy shop and get away with it, my dear friend Carol Dean Sharpe finds THIS on YouTube:
The image was created using the marker to stamp technique after the initial inking of the entire teacup in Blushing Bride ink. I stamped the violet sprigged background on the Wisteria Wonder cardstock with Versamark, and added the Cup of Thanks sentiment on a Blushing Bride Modern Label Punch. The bow was created a little differently. I folded the bow, and then used sticky strip to wrap around the center and hold the shape. Adding the adorable Blushing Bride Button and Pearl gives it the extra detail that makes card-making fun!
Find out where the local grocery store is, and instead of eating out, which is costly and often unhealthy, go and by something you can cook/prepare for dinner. If you do find a supermarket, it’s also a good idea to stock up on snacks, especially if you are on the move. When I arrive at a new destination I like to find the local grocery store and stock up on things like fruit, bread, cheese and crackers and ofcourse a few naughty chocolates and chips. It’s so much cheaper and easier than having to go out every night trying to find somewhere to have dinner that won’t break the budget or the jeans zipper!
Merry New Thanksmas Eve to you all!
Both of my friends were really quite happy with their care – and the decisions about them and the information they received were absolutely correct. The problem lay in how they were told – without real care or compassion.
As long as they are physically capable we turn very few applicants away. I do feel sorry for the boy, virtually blind from childhood in one eye, that I have to turn away. That disability could compromise his safety in a minefield, but I know he will have no other opportunities in this village. I turn down some other boys for being under age. They may state firmly that they are 19, but giving me their real date of birth (and the documentation to prove it) is a bit of a give away. They are disappointed, but philosophical, joining their chums and watching proceedings as we provide the day's entertainment.
Over the weekend, Josh and I pigged out at Portillo's for our long awaited Big Beef sandwiches and cheese fries and chocolate cake shake and strawberry shortcake....mmm. I could eat Portillo's every day and never get tired of it. Josh and I are planning to go to shabu shabu tomorrow. We decided on just treating each other to dinner instead of exchanging gifts.
Similar Types Framework unique, but sometimes puzzled with un­related blackbirds, which often co-occur with starlings in large flocks. Blackbirds more trim bodied, with longer tails and less-pointy wings. Trip account more like a waxwing’s or a meadowlark’s than blackbird’s.
Do you think taking a picture of Vinci’s “Joconde” at the Louvre museum and printing it ten times to your friends, which will print it ten times for their friends also is stealing the actual painting? Sure it’s not and it has never been. It has nothing to do with the “digital age”. Only the scale of sharing is different but, who cares? If you print 2 billion copies of the picture, you’ll may be get more people interested in seeing it live or buying the official lithographies.
I think it's time we put our mouths where they belong... and start with JUSTICE FOR LUCY. Make the abuse stop, find the dog fighters and shut them down. Put an end to the madness. And do it now. Now I have to go puke. Because as often as I hear or see this, you never get hard to it. KNOW WHERE YOUR DOGS END UP PEOPLE. And that's all I have to say about that...
And that’s exactly how NBC’s Andrea Mitchell is going to report it.
Patricia Briggs
﻿﻿﻿The past couple of weeks we've gone to the zoo and the children's museum. The zoo was wonderful because Emily loves animals. She would get as close as she could and wave to each animal. She was so excited to pet the goat and the horse. Roaring at the lion was big-time fun. And trying to pet the white tiger might have made her day. Oh, making monkey noises at the monkies was pretty cute.
Everything worked out perfectly because I had just gotten off probation the week before. I had been on probation for literally the last 3 years and so I haven't been able to leave the state of Michigan during that whole time.
Curiosity overwhelmed Sam's fear. "I thought you had electricity. I thought this place was modern."
Even a small Ordinariate parish in a town can become the front porch of Catholicism where passerby can sit under the eves and chat and become familiar with the stranger’s faith. There the inquisitive can received studied, thoughtful and challenging answers that will inspire the heart and free the mind.
*He LOVES to brush his hair. I started singing "Brusha Brusha Brusha" (you know, from Grease) to him and now HE SAYS it back! It might be the funniest thing he does yet! He did it for my mom and sister last night and they were rolling!!!
Dedicated to those left behind on the Trail of Tears.
Martha Henson and Danny Birchall
I've asked several of my student classes and every time I mention Mobily they all wake from their gerund-learning-induced stupors and start laughing and shouting about how much they despise the 1100 number.
My skin HATES me right now. It's a mixture of the weather, recovering from surgery, and general bad skin. Blargh.
somewhere within me
On the subject of boredom, I have also been having increased difficulty watching performances. It pretty much doesn't matter who it is, I often find myself getting distracted somewhere in the middle. Usually I find myself tuning out because I am imagining what I would do at a certain point in the music, or how my overall conception would be different. Or if they get into a particular position or do an interesting figure I imagine what I could do with that position or figure, what the possible entrances and exits and expressive uses could be. Worst of all, sometimes what I'm seeing just looks like something I've seen a million times before. It is this last thing which most disturbs me. Uniformity, in my opinion, is symptomatic of fad mentality, and if we're not careful it will sink tango back into relative obscurity. Which, perhaps, is inevitable anyway. To what degree and in what matter of time is the question. And, I suppose, whether it goes down with dignity or as a caricature of its true self.
I decided to use this recipe. With a couple of changes (I'll note those in the recipe below). It wasn't acutally until I was assembling the lasagne that my cupcake intuition took over (and a little inspiration from Stef). I just so happened to have a little bit of ingredients left so I decided to whip them into cupcake form! Look how beautiful they are! I was so afraid that the noodles were going to be hard and chewy around the top of the cups. Nope! They were a crispy, almost crackery crust. They were perfect! I actually wish now that I would have done all of them this way. Oh well, gives me an excuse to have to make lasagna again!
So imagine my delight, this evening, when my wife presented me with a surprise gift - a waterproof notebook. It can be written in using pen or pencil and it will survive any soaking. Brilliant!
Click on Save.
Social breakdown and the strength of society is important to Jeanette because she needed to get the sense of community that was lacking in the home from somewhere. “I never believed that my parents loved me.” (And suddenly it becomes clear why love is relentlessly presented as our highest value and achievement in her fiction.) “When love is unreliable and you are a child, you assume that it is the nature of love – its quality – to be unreliable.” The Bible helped, telling her that God loved her, but as she reached middle age, she found herself unable to resist seeking out her first mother, the one who gave her up. “Adoption drops you into the story after it has started. … The feeling that something is missing never, ever leaves you – and it can’t, and it shouldn’t, because something is missing.” The last third of the book is a gripping and powerfully affecting trail in search of her birth mother, and of what happens afterwards. It is typically honest and unsparing, and left me feeling emotionally exhausted.
Happy Mabon! or Happy Autumn Equinox!
lately i've been moving away from white casein paint and towards white gouache. my favorite is m. graham titanium white, and a big tube that will last *a long time* is only $9.35 at dick blick. i now have holbein, winsor and newton, and m. graham gouache in a bunch of colors and i like them all, but nothing compares to m. graham titanium white for a white - in my opinion of course!
Because there has been a lot of talk about the Republican War on Women, in Texas and elsewhere, I wondered what others thought about the idea that there is a new strain of anti-man writing in our society. I think that patriarchy as we have always known it is starting to flatten like other hierarchies (the economy, corporations, education) in part because of deindustrialization. As that has happened, the definition of manhood has shifted, so that it cannot solely depend on women, children and job status as a man’s sole indicator of how manly he is.
Person that I know is more than a man or any man would every be.
One of the most important reports ever issued by a government office or agency. The OTA (Office of Technology Assessment) has recently been discontinued due to budget cutbacks; a vivid illustration of the inevitable destiny of those messengers who bear ill tidings.
Now, this may sound just a little odd however you have to take into consideration who you need to meet and date or start a friendship with. In case you are simply searching for real love, then that may are available any shape or type nevertheless, if you are in search of a sure type of one who is the same religion or leads a certain life-style; it’s essential to think about this. It might not all the time be so vital to everybody but typically will probably be and you need to give lots of thought to this because some people will be searching for a certain type of individual so take into consideration first just in case.
Shout out to all you guys who can’t seem to shake those “special” people in your lives!
" What ?"
California is also a battleground. The Los Angeles Times reports on another chapter in the campaign to destroy what had been the greatest public higher education system in the world: "California State University officials announced plans to freeze enrolment next spring at most campuses and to wait-list all applicants the following fall pending the outcome of a proposed tax initiative on the November ballot."
I wouldn’t necessarily compare us to a fine wine, but neither would I call us a rotting corpse. In fact, rejoined, we found an evening full of life.
Advertising is and has – for as long as anyone who reads this can remember – been part of the daily function of our lives. No big deal… it’s just a part of modern life.
I live in Saint Helena CA, but grew up just down the Hwy in Napa through the Eighties.
Now that I’m a wife, mother, and employee, my writing unfortunately gets pushed to the back burner far more often that I would like. But God is so gracious. Somehow, there is still time for me to devote to my passion and I’m very excited about the novel I’m currently working on, not to mention blogging every day in May! But I am a writer. I will find time to squeeze it in somewhere!
Happy Birthday to our sweet girl Morgan!
I want to thank John Bascom for asking me to write this review of his debut novel, Caine's Pestilence. I thoroughly enjoyed reading the book. This novel was a page-turner which piqued my interest to know what was coming next after each twist and turn of the plot. Caine's Pestilence is a dystopian novel set in the near future in which there is a conspiracy by the government to influence its citizens by using its power to control their lives through every means possible. It gives us an idea of how things might look in the United States if we continue to allow government intrusiveness into our lives and permit it to expand like it has been steadily expanding and growing over at least the past 50 years or so.
Yet my sense of conflict and ambivalence about the film emerges from the inescapable fact that the sturdy premise is played entirely for laughs. In no sense is the subject matter respected or vetted in a faithful manner. This Barnabas is not a tortured, tragic, Byronic figure, and his relations with the Collins family are mined for humor but not pathos or even intrigue. The film’s sense of reality is thus paper thin and easily crumpled.
Table 1. Plutonium Material Balance
There are three really great things about the tattle jar. First and most importantly it cuts down the tattling by at least 80%, at least by my best estimation. I've never really done the research.
The Swag Pack include a Hex Boys Heaven poster, the handcuffs Ayden used on Aurora, and the Celtic Cross Aurora's Grandmother gave to her. Best of all, this swag pack giveaway is open to everyone, international participants, too.
General Charles G. Boyd, USAF (Ret.) Deputy Commander in Chief, European Command (‘92-‘95)
“Can you believe this? We have hundreds of little Gaddafis now.”
to having an opportunity to share my book proposal with you soon.=0A=0ASinc=
Participating whole life policies also offer the producer a number of different approaches to selling their value to clients. The first way is to encourage the policy owner to consider paying premiums every year. In this situation, death benefit and cash value growth will be the strongest. For those people looking to pay premiums to retirement, say, age 65, there are two approaches.
If I leave it here, it might stay there for years?! Become some sort of shrine to the local pissed-up kids?!
2. Please join me for the opening reception of AWAKENINGS! Original, affordable art, live music and more…and all for a good cause (% of proceeds go to people recovering from traumatic brain injuries)! Artwork all $500 and below so come out for an evening of creativity and help others! Friday, March 16, 6-9pm, Gallery U, 80 Broad St., Red Bank, NJ. Show runs thru 4/16/12
3/4 cup all purpose flour
Open a solid Asian restaurant in Central Austin within a few miles of my house that is open until 10:00 p.m., and I will kiss your feet and throw rose petals on the path before you.
1/2 medium sweet apple (Fuji, Gala, or Golden Delicious), grated
I read it's International Write-A-Tiny-Poem Day, over at Women Rule Writer's blog, and thought it would be lovely to join in and post a tiny for you here. It's also Mother's Day (if my blog posts this with the wrong date - it's lying - trust me it's mother's day; I have hand made cards, flowers with half of next door's shrub still attached, and gifts), one of my gifts has a curiously worded label, which is now my found tiny poem:
Here, the last M train pulls out of 36th Street, on the slow chug to Bay Parkway and into history.
This week for Card Creating Sunday, I am showing you the cutest Christmas card! I saw the directions online at Splitcoaststampers.com (Pyramid Card by Kirsteen Gill). I just thought it was adorable and easy to make. I tweaked a few things to make it my own so to speak. I used Twinkle Toes for the tree skirt and the squares were cut at 3.75" from Plantin Schoolbook. I added lots of holes with my Crop-O-Dile and then added bling! The gathered ribbon around the based of the tree skirt is actually paper I accordion folded and glued down. I do recommend using Terrifically Tacky Tape to hold down the completed tree skirt. Have fun and enjoy!
Transuranic wastes are listed as slightly over 2,000,000 Ci. Other than this graph, this publication contains no specific data about waste production inventories.
81. All elephants walk on tiptoe, because the back portion of their foot is made up of all fat and no bone.
Necessity might be the mother of invention, but overpriced metal model box sets are the mother of conversion. Here are the Panzerknackers, in all their Bloo-Flame glory.
I couldn't even get a good picture of their launch! lol
Commander in Chief, U.S. Naval Forces Europe/Commander in Chief, Allied Forces Southern Europe (‘96-‘98)
It doesn't help when Jo Williams (the mom in the first two films repeatedly told reporters that the paintings on her wall would be tilted at odd angles when she returned home from filming and that the skeleton props used in the first movie were actually possessed by angry spirits. While it may make for great convention fodder it comes off as a tad disrespectful 30 years later.
John, wrote that God has made believers his own children and then added, “What we will be has not yet been made known;” but we do know that when Jesus “appears, we shall be like him.” (1 John 3:1-2)
The crass plug first. I was lucky enough to be asked to contribute some reviews to the book Endless Trip, an American/Canadian companion volume to Galactic Ramble. But even if that weren't the case I would still highly recommend it. A fantastic collection of reviews, both new and vintage, of 60s & 70s era pop, psych, folk, prog, rock, r&b, & even some jazz. It's bigger than your phonebook, even if you live in a major metro area, containing over 3000 reviews, both well-known and obscure. Click the book title to order your copy.
MELBOURNE property developer Baracon Group stands accused of misleading and deceptive behaviour over the sale of the historic Argus building on the corner of
A four-year, $10 million effort to digitize the JFK Library and Museum’s archives, making hundreds of thousands of documents, photographs, and recordings available online, is nearing completion of its first phase. A formal announcement will come Jan. 13, one week before the 50th anniversary of JFK’s inauguration, at a press conference in the nation’s capitol.
London Councils have today issued a press release urging the government to bring forward plans to help local authorities deal with dangerous dogs http://www.londoncouncils.gov.uk/news/current/pressdetail.htm?pk=1472. This has got to be right. Last year Defra issued a public consultation on possible changes to the dangerous dogs legislation, the main one being the Dangerous Dogs Act 1991 http://www.defra.gov.uk/wildlife-pets/pets/dangerous/ Everyone from dog owners to the public seem to agree that this legislation is not working – well the very fact that the number of dogs seized by the Metropolitan Police rose from 193 in 2006 to 1,107 in 2010 and the number destroyed went up from 27 to 563 in the same period tells its own story.
Life in the Kiandutu Slums is hard living and that’s why life on the streets of Thika Town is not a bad alternative to some of the children growing up there. I call these children “The Lost Boys of Thika Town”.
The number of people leaving Spain to look for work is now greater than the number of immigrants who arrive in the country in search of a job.
Humble Pie…Not only the best stadium rock band of all time but also something we need served up to us from time to time as well. The X-Fit annual regional sword fight was over the weekend and we tip our hat to all the competitors, honestly.
TuTu Pink
I was very nervous by then because I was worried about how I was going to pull off a melodic minor scale. But to my surprise, they only asked me to play any major scale on the page. I breathed a sigh of relief and played a major scale. Then I was supposed to play nine bars of music. That means nine measures of the music, but I didn’t count it out, I played on and on. Finally, I stopped and asked if that was enough. The men smiled at me and said it was more than enough but they thought I was doing such a great job they didn’t want to stop me. That was a relief.
The musical got me so excited, that I simply decided to help the organizers of the next year’s musical find their new stars. As we all know, a performer does not only have to be talanted, but also good-looking. So I searched hard, but I finally found them – the Rolex-es of beauty, the Mercedes-es of talent and the Armani-s of singing…
Everyone in my group was a great person, however I was older than the next closest person by about two years. At UW I have friends who are years older than me as well as younger than me, however there is a difference between people mid college and those about to get out. The primary difference being in concerns for the future. When people started worrying about registration for the next academic session I started worrying about getting a career upon return. Normally after college ends you have three months left on your lease, which gives you a buffer period to start looking for jobs. That alone offers some support, but additionally the support of friends approaching the same transition makes it much less daunting and seem somehow more certain. These differences manifest themselves in subtle ways, however they are persistent over time. Differences are distracting and have a limiting effect on relationships at times by making it harder to relate to the subjects of conversation.
Click on the picture for printable cover art and annotated track listing, should you so require.
I’ve been surprised to see the issues of gluttony, sloth, and self-discipline show up over and over again in the stories of Christians. It all started when we were reading the story of John Wycliffe, and his detractors mocked him for being a glutton. I was first struck by the fact that we rarely hear that charge in American culture. It’s a sin we just don’t discuss. I was next surprised to realize that Wycliffe was rail-thin. He must have possessed a great metabolism, because he could eat. Gluttony (in food, drink, or any other area) is an issue that history treats rather matter-of-factly. So does the Bible. (Remember the story of Ehud in Judges 3? Yep, no punches pulled there. )
This week, backwards:
You’re an Ancient Travelling Man
two slices of preserved meyer lemon, finely diced
So at the end of the day, the question bears asking: was justice served when bin Laden was killed?
Late recovery begins when people are unable to build a comfortable and balanced lifestyle because of unfinished business from childhood. It ends when recovering people resolve their family of origin problems and are able to approach adult living without being affected by irrational childhood beliefs. Some people move through late recovery quickly and with little pain. For others the process is longer and more difficult because they were emotionally, physically, or sexually abused as children, or never developed adequate social skills. Late recovery begins with the recognition that childhood issues are affecting the quality of recovery. They can see that they are blindly repeating self-defeating habits that they learned as children. They began to see that the only way out is to learn about family of origin issues by getting accurate information about how childhood experiences can affect their quality of adult sobriety. The next step is the conscious examination of childhood by writing a detailed childhood history and reviewing it with a therapist, sponsor, or recovery group. This history identifies repeating self-destructive patterns of irrational thinking, emotional mismanagement, and self-defeating behaviors that were learned as children. Knowledge of these patterns gives the power to choose to continue in self-destructive patterns or to change. This knowledge must be applied to adult living in order to consciously connect what they learned as children to how they are mismanaging their lives as sober adults. This leads to lifestyle change. These deeply ingrained self-defeating habits will not disappear simply because we understand how they were developed. We must decide to change our lifestyles, set goals, develop action plans, and enlist the help of others.
stiff legs plodding,
*no pun intended
Line prepared mini-muffin pan with wonton wrappers, lightly pressing into place to form a cup. Using a small spoon, fill each cup with mixture almost to the top.
Mr Livingstone, whose Left-wing views saw him ostracised by Labour under Tony Blair, also hailed Ed Miliband’s ‘genuine Labour values’ and suggested that next month’s mayoral contest was a dress rehearsal for the general election expected in 2015.
And I’ve despised the human race to feel the passion in the scorn
After putting 1 ladle full of batter into your preheated pan, the oatcake will start to cook and steam. When the oatcake has a load of holes in it, and is starting to look dry as in this picture, it is time to start to release the edges with your spatula and start to work the oatcake free of the bottom of the pan.
Ah yes, the ambitions. “Kya zarurat hai aur aage padhneki? Tu chup chaap kitchen ka kaam sikh warna sasuraal ke taane khaane padege hume; sun-na padega ki maa ne kuch sikhaya nahi.” Which translates to ‘What’s the need of studying furthermore? Just shut up and learn the kitchen work otherwise we’ll have to endure the taunts of your in-laws, they’ll say that the mother has taught you nothing”. Yeah, I agree that kitchen work and household chores are to be learnt. BUT NOT BY WOMEN ALONE. NOT WHEN THERE’S AN EQUALLY AGED BROTHER IN THE HOUSE SITTING AND CHUCKLING AT THE PLIGHT OF HIS SISTER WATCHING TELEVISION AND EATING CHEETOS. I’m a pretty good chef myself and I feel insanely lucky to be brought up in a house where such nonsense doesn’t occur. Would it, I’m pretty sure I wouldn’t let it last for long. I can go on and on about this stupid practice that’s common in households, even valid at times cause the girls are plain lazy at times; but the way its said. But the way they indicate that your future lies as a housewife, cleaning, mopping cooking… Fuck you. Fuck you all. And what on earth do you mean by “Kya zaroorat hai?” You bunch of dimwitted gits! And I bellow fire.
Robbins points out that just because we don’t understand the ways in which animals communicate, doesn’t mean that they are less intelligent than us or idiots. Millions of people on this planet speak different languages that others cannot understand, but that doesn’t mean that either respective party is stupid or less intelligent. Furthermore, people with disabilities communicate differently, understand things differently, and demonstrate their emotions, build bonds, and act out differently. This does not in any way, shape, or form mean that people with disabilities are stupid or less intelligent than others. In fact, in my experience, those with disabilities find alternative methods to do the same things or process the same information that the average person is completely unaware of. Flip the table: does this mean that the average person is stupid because he or she doesn’t know how to do something? Can we even say that these alternative methods are inferior to the average methods or is it possible that these methods allow individuals to arrive at a conclusion or digest information quicker and more thoroughly? (This is my issue with standardized testing and measurements – everyone is different, thinks differently, acts differently, and understands things differently. It’s ridiculous to hold people up to some sort of determined average that doesn’t accurately reflect anyone’s level of intelligence.) By that logic, it is entirely possible that some creatures, like whales or dolphins, are far, far superior to us with respect to intelligence; we just don’t understand their methods and we certainly can’t mimic them (yet..who knows what science will come up with).
(At the most,)
Quinoa is an amino acid-rich (protein) seed that has a fluffy, creamy, slightly crunchy texture and a somewhat nutty flavor when cooked. Most commonly considered a grain, quinoa is actually a relative of leafy green vegetables like spinach and Swiss chard. The leaves of the quinoa plant are edible, with a taste similar to its green-leafed relatives.
Cripple and even closing some smaller businesses.
38Lost in a convent's solitary gloom!
I'm currently working on an article, per request, on caches and establishing a cache network for logistics support. Following that, I will write one on the development on Escape-and-Evasion networks, also per request, as well as one on the OODA loop developed by Boyd.
Camosun & 29th Ave – 8:58am
I wanted this hallway to be the place for
and the clouds were drifting slowly by
Aguirre won the Dist 2-5a Title 4 years in a row. He won the Region 1 title 3 years in a row, after a 2nd place finish his Freshman year. His Region 1 Record at Mae Simmons Park stood for 24 years until Colby Lowe broke it last year. He was a 2 time State Champion (1981,1983) a 2nd place finisher in 1982 and finished 4th as a Freshman in 1980. The most impressive race to me was winning his Sophomore year over the great Carlos Quinones (Killeen). Quinones was a tremendous talent who finished his career with Track Pr's of 1:50, 4:08 and 9:10. Carlos was the 1981 State Champ in the 800 and the 1982 State Champ in the 3200. He had range. Bobby was coming off a 4th place finish as a Freshman (to Quinones' 3rd) . There is a story (reliable sources tell me it is true) that Bobby had a shirt made that said State Champ on it. Quinones approached him and asked him, "When were you State Champ?" Bobby replied, "I will be today" Quinones asked him, "What race are you in?" Bobby replied, "The one you're in!" Arrogant? A little, but he backed it up as he won the meet in 15:10. Quinones was 3rd.
STRAIGHT FORWARD ACTION: A bachelor wants to get married.
she patted the corners of her mouth
